Sure, Charlie couldn't resist trying to win Alices' collection of skulls (including one from a goat). But he can't knit! And what if the guys on his hockey team find out?
I am sad because I know that whatever I put in this review will not do Code Name Verity justice. I just cannot tell you in words how amazing I think this book is. It is hard for me to write about this book, if I say too much I will give stuff away and it will ruin the book for others. (Careless talk costs lives) It is that kind of book. It manages to keep surprising you and shocking you. You think you know what is happening but the truth is that you know nothing at all.
This could be a card, a tag, an altered item, a scrapbook page, anything you fancy!
"Shut the f*** up. Shut. The. F***. Up." PeyPey called Jeannie. "Um, yeah. Can you believe this?" Jeannie said. "I'm just kind of speechless." PeyPey said. "Let me call you back. My sister's beeping in," Jeannie replied.
The delegations are scheduled to mass on the Lebanese and Jordanian borders with Israel and at West Bank and Gaza checkpoints on March 30, when Israeli Arabs mark Earth Day every year.
nothing from death" -
Also, The Anniversary of Jack's death is on the 21st of this month.
And in a bit of irony that would have William Shakespeare smacking his Elizabethan head, this would also lead to one of the worst products ever released by both parties.
» 11/9 – Philadelphia, PA @ Wachovia Center
After the discount, the cost would be £13.50 (GBP) or $22.50 (USD)
Just click on my mom's name to see her page. Look at the pictures of other events if you get a second. It's an amazing thing they are doing.
Another law, the Extradition and Mutual Assistance in Criminal Matters Legislation Amendment Act 2012 was passed earlier this month. Jeffrey Bleich prefigured this move when, in a story published on 12 November 2011 while talking about WikiLeaks, he said:
9. Have you ever met anyone famous? It's kind of a stretch, but once when I was working at the Gap in Victoria, David Suzuki (a well known Canadian environmentalist) came in. That's all I've got.
3/What was the name of this singers backing group?
Crying out so desperately
Also, because I am heading out of town on Tuesday, I will be ENDING this giveaway at 9pm EST on Sunday 4/8. I will use random.org to select a winner. The winner will need to respond to me no later than 4pm EST on Monday 4/9. If winner does not contact me by said time, I will delay shipping for at least a week (since I’ll be out of town).
Once in the rowboat, I sighed happily and looked around at the scenery. The forest was back to its friendly self, filled with the noise of chipmunks and birds chattering in the trees. The bushes were no longer menacing hideaways for a masked man intent on murder, but merely the bushes that led to the trail that brought you to the tree house that Francis had built last summer. I glanced over at Meg & Em’s downcast faces and said loftily, “Well, I don’t care. Buried treasure is more trouble than it’s worth. Wanna play Orphans?”
I saw a bird, he sang a song
I was in the airport a week or so ago and saw a woman reading 'The Hunger Games.' She was about two chapters in when she dog-eared the page to keep her place. My brain screamed, "THE HORROR! Why can't you just use your boarding pass as a bookmark?" I'm always reprimanding my mum for using the jacket flaps of hardback books to mark her place. She's sure that's what they're for. I am adamant it is not and oft thrust bookmarks at her to keep her from her wicked ways.
This week Mom's friend had to let her sweet boy Maximus go to the Rainbow Bridge. He started having trouble walking earlier this week and the vet found lesions on his brain. She made the difficult decision to let him go yesterday.
1/4 c. vegetable oil
Now this is really a surprise to those of us who believe that Obama will stop at nothing to get re-elected. Even without dirty hands, why in the world we go this route? Just asking.
This motorsport budget will include the primary team owner as sole proprietor.
No blog this weekend, too much to do between getting the house ready and cooking for Easter dinner and preparing for the birth of my third grandchild. My daughter is scheduled for a c-section at 9:30 tomorrow morning. I can’t wait!
Joan Millman
We have been quite rude, yes. and also we didn't really try to make her feel welcome. That's the fate of any photographer who gets close to us I fear. Cameras just get on our nerves quite quickly. It is just so annoying when there is someone stalking around you capturing every move you make, because that makes you enormously "self consious". Having said that however, she did manage to capture the essence of who we are in images. It doesn't cease to amaze me how she managed to do that. especially considering the fact that it was such a jumble with the string and brass sections around. When you have to portrait a solo artist you can probably still manipulate things a bit. But having to work with a mad gang like ours ... that doesn't sound like an easy job to me.
But today I wanted to try a whole new way of eating them......almond milk.
Marks little brother loaded us all into the back of his van and brought us all to the hospital. I stayed for one night and fractured my knee and two fingers. So I'm sorry if some of this is spelled atrociously... No one was seriously injured though. The worst anyone had was a broken arm and he was one of the guys who launched twenty feet. Thanks for reading and remember to never drink and sled or sled with inflatable pools. Both those things are bad.
Dreamcast Emulator
She kind of caught me off guard with that one. I don't think anyone has ever asked me that question so directly before. And if you've been around here for awhile, then you know that I've been avoiding asking myself that question because I'm afraid of what the answer might be (read this post and this one, if you don't know what I'm talking about).
This recipe is linked to the following blog carnivals.
below the threshold at which donations have to be publicly registered with the Electoral Commission.
So our verse, Acts 27:23 takes on a new shade of meaning. “For there stood by me this night the angel of God, whose I am, and whom I serve (and worship).”
Frankly there’s not much I don’t like about this little vibe. It does what it sets out to do and does it well. The controls are intuitive and I like that they light up (all the easier to see in a candle-lit bathroom) and that there’s a separate on/off switch, so you don’t have to flip through a million whizzing settings to get to ‘off’ once the business is done. It’s the small things, you know.
After racially abusing BBC’s Johah Fisher in April, 2010, after Fisher remarked that Malema lives in an affluent suburb of Johannesburg, Malema was unapologetic about his actions. He accused Fisher of being disrespectful and of coming from a country that undermines the credibility and integrity of African leaders. But Malema’s narcissism is most evident in his insistence that Fisher apologise after the incident, despite the fact that the ANC and President Jacob Zuma condemned Malema’s outburst.
directing.
"A retailer places an order for your book through Ingram Book Company, a wholesaler.
Racked: 01-17-2009 (w/ 1 oz. Ahtanum)
Firstly, the swatches differ significantly in fluorescent lighting versus natural daylight – I don’t know how my camera picked up so many “sparkles” under fluorescent lighting, but the lipsticks certainly don’t seem to have sparkles in them.
In column B, this is the way I’ve been trained in boxing: cardio/conditioning, skipping, jab/cross/hook/etc on heavy bag, jab/cross/hook/etc on focus mitts, sparring. Repeat all.
As a giving community, AfrikaBurn prohibits any monetary exchange and that idea is really stressed on. You don’t have to get your keys or your ID card in order to go someplace, you just need your two feet and your brain. Having an open mind is probably one of the largest things to carry with you at all times; without it, the Karoo isn’t right for you. Since we all lived together in this abyss of communal entity, we ended up using that idea of giving, trading our neighbors for some cheese in exchange for eggs, beer for water, fire for coffee. The exchanges were always fair and it always meant that you could meet and talk with someone completely new.
The equivalence between this passion of extreme indication and the emotion which is color’s radical is beautifully legible within Anaxagoras’s color-inflected cosmology and his proof of the blackness of snow. For Anaxagoras, the cosmos is an eternal mixture of everything with everything whose apparent becoming does not substantially alter its original indifferentiation: “All things were together, unlimited both in amount and in smallness, for the small, too, was unlimited. And because all things were
Sailing at night is like sailing during the day except that you need to run navigation lights. This makes sailing at night the most energy expensive.
Whether you plan your family’s meals on Sunday or on some other day, doing so can be a great blessing for you and your family.
Mists of Pandaria is around the virtual corner. Some guesses put it as soon as June, some as late as September, but regardless of when it comes, we’re wrapping up Cataclysm. We’re in the last tier of content, we’ve killed the Big Boss, and Blizzard has repeatedly confirmed there will not be a filler raid between now and MoP. Further, beta started this week. The door is closing.
Then there was the magic shows,
There's more. It's ANNOTATED!!
I tell you all about the world beyond
I dont understand why this would happen; its not like they’re a random member of the public or press where something could potentially happen to her. And facing the wall? Embarrassing and disrespectful are the words. I understand that she has some really hard years, but treating people like that is not the way…. treating them like badly behaved school boys …… sorry my imagination just took over for a sec. Diva is also another word; The Wanted were opening with her at a concert and they received this . I cant even imagine what they were thinking while they were doing it. Me personally, I would have started laughing. Its what I do in awkward and shocking situations. Weird I know. But Im sure they must have had a similar reaction. Poor guys, oh well that’s showbiz.
Around 5:00pm or so, I started feeling pressure in my bottom with the rushes. I started to get a warm sensation as well and for a minute or two thought this might be an unassisted birth if my midwives didn't show up soon. However, at just a little after 5:30pm there was a knock at the door and it was them. They weren't even completely inside yet before I had another rush came and pressure, then pop! My water broke. I heard myself saying: My water just broke! And then they were quickly there, helping me get something under me to save my carpet and getting my underwear off. Good thing I had them on, because very little fluid got on my carpet :-).
I guess what I'm saying is, it's a good place to base your Kentucky getaway. It has plenty of amenities but more of a small town feel than Louisville or Lexington.
Because despite the case-by-case expectations of equality in gender roles, culturally we haven’t let go of the paternalistic authority of men over women. And stories about the “decline” of our men-folk aren’t making things better for any of us.
The first time I tripped over your shoes,
Anyways, I decided to let Miss AuBrynne pick the colors in her room entirely.
I am passionate about leading a natural, conscious and sustainable life. Our home is chemical free and we are an organic fair-trade wholefood family, who tries to do our bit for the environment. I love secondhand wares and visit ‘op shops’ weekly searching for things I can repurpose. There is something very satisfying about making use of something that has so much history inside of it!
He also knows your address: “I know….where you dwell…” (Revelation 2:13 NKJV).
It has to be homemade Macaroni and Cheese
A Werewolf in Manhattan (Wild About You Series #1)
Dorry is unbearably lonely at her new high school until she meets Angela and her circle of friends. She soon discovers they all belong to a religious group, the Fishers of Men. At first, as Dorry becomes involved with the Fishers, she is eager to fit in and flattered by her new friends’ attention.
But i'm starting to change my mind. i don't think that the change is as far off as i had imagined. Could it be that my daughters will never take their little ones to pray for an end to abortion outside of the local clinic because abortion will have become something that our nation has rejected? Could it be that the children born to my grandchildren will be safe from genetic or sexual discrimination - and that there will be an acceptance and a sheltering for all human life - no matter the size, level of dependence or development? Could it be that classrooms of children will cringe as they look at photos of the killing that took place in the year 2012, and will ask the adult teaching them..."But why didn't anyone stop them. Weren't people shocked at the injustice? Wasn't it obvious that it was human life being taken?" & i wonder what the teacher will answer as they look together at the evidence, the photographic proof that is before them, just like my socials class asked our teacher those same questions while we watched Schindler's List in highschool... We were blind then to the double standard that condemned Hitler's killing spree... and condoned abortion in our own cities.
Finally, what is your process or how do you prepare a role for performance?
Name: (redacted)
Hey, everyone has skeletons in their closet. But it sounds to me like Gingrich has a record of poor ethics when in a position of power. Not good for a perspective candidate.
GIRL CAN’T HELP IT
There are essentially 3 camps:
It will be the internet-from-nowhere, a connective ghost whose quasi-magical presence has been promised to us not only by the gurus of modern technology and political liberation, but by ancient myths and folktales: a cloud of voices from afar to which we are invisibly connected at every moment, everyday.
Strawberry.
Lots of fun food and relaxation to be had.
Pretty rude
"Exactly," he said, giving me a grin as my eyes lit up with understanding.
3. Go leave some comment love for the five minutes
You will have a difficult life for some part of it, but that is what will make you the beautiful and strong young lady you will grow up to be. At one point life will get hard and you will do something stupid, but in the end you will realize that it was not worth it.
Level 8: Reduces the damage received from the enemies by 9%.
2. Remove the skin and bones from the chicken, cut the meat into 1-inch chunks, then pulse quickly in a food processor until the texture of coarsely ground meat (in the old days, the chicken was fed through a meat grinder). When the pork is tender, cut into 1-inch chunks, then pulse just as you did the chicken. Also pulse the chicken liver.
But at daybreak on the first day of the week they took the spices they had prepared and went to the tomb. They found the stone rolled away from the tomb; but when
sew when she was determined to make Barbie Doll clothes for me as a child.
I don’t deny the fact that most people, especially Westerners might find Delhi’s chaotic ambiance frightening but the trick to enjoy this city is to come with an open mind and be prepared to expect the unexpected. If I were to give out travel tips, all I have to say is go foot loose and yeah, girls dress conservatively.
It's been ages since I last coloured an image so my card today is one I've coloured using Distress Inks. The stamp or I should say stamps are my bargain buys, yes Buzzcraft clear Rubbber stamp sets, I bought 2 sets for £2.99 each set.
Playin football is a blast. But I gotsta tell ya. Sittin on the sidelines during a game……..sucks. Yeah its safer. You cant get hurt…..but ..whats the point if you aren’t IN the game? Ya feel me?
Here is the site that Patches found. I thought I had better warn you readers out there (especially those with cats) because you might be in the same boat, and it is better off if you read it for yourself! The author really knows what he is talking about and I fear we may be in for an ambush!
academic performance in middle school.
Here they are garnished with confectioner's sugar but the possibilities are endless. Try them drizzled with chocolate sauce, strawberry sauce or even a maple syrup. It's up to you how sweet you want them.
Rebutter#3: Adam Beizer
LL “Thrill of The Chase”, because at that point in my life I was really trying to figure out what my style was. Working with producers, they kind of help me develop my craft and my sound. The producers made the beat and we wrote the song together. It’s catchy and people can relate to it.
(heh. heh.)
The thing that really struck me was a collection of Valentines from about the 1930's... They are so fragile, intricate and amazing as pieces of artwork. Someone kept these for 70-80 years and they certainly aren't the cheap copy paper versions that I looked at in Target the other day that feature SpongeBob, Hannah Montana and My Little Ponies for Darling's 1st grade class.
There is a lot of argument over whether calling someone a retard is a good idea or bad idea.
Oups! Mais pas de dégâts - tout va bien! Ouf!
Another great thing about the Boba is that you can occasionally find it 40% off! (Ergos never seem to go on sale!) I was able to get mine 40% off on Black Friday, and apparently they were 40% off on Zulily.com a couple of weeks ago. And if you hurry, you can get 40% off the Boba Classic Collection thru Monday, February 21 thru many retailers worldwide! That makes it only $60!! (If you miss this sale, I recommend becoming a friend of "Boba Carrier" on Facebook. That's how I found out about the Black Friday sale and the President's Day sale.)
Hiking in August may mean uncomfortable humidity and heat, but it also means the chance to listen to the summer symphony of insects, amphibians and birds as they approach their seasonal crescendo. On my recent hike along the 1.3-mile Beech Bluff Trail, the katydids, bullfrogs and birds were in full concert, creating a natural soundtrack for my hike. In addition to its auditory pleasures, I found the trail traverses a mature forest with large trees including beech, oak and tulip poplar; a bluff overlooking a creek and bottomlands; and some views of the backwaters of Lake Higgins.
never in my wildest dreams did I think that I'd lose such a dear friend.
This exercise plays a crucial role in providing information that helps to counsel employees. The information helps to identify deficiency in employees regarding skill and knowledge, determine training and developmental needs, recommend means for employee growth, and give suggestions for correcting placement. The performance appraisal form becomes a permanent record that has an impact on your career not only in the same organization, but may also be used as reference if requested by a future employer.
You can’t deconstruct these great literature and impose a twisted patriarchal narrative upon them, sorry women aren’t stupid. We also had to read lots of lesbian feminist theory for the seminar, which was even more hateful of men but curiously weren’t assigned any theory written by women who denounced this feminist jihad on the arts and every other aspect of life.
is not a survey. However, if you feel like filling it out, and completing part of the grant process with our community – do so, and then email it to brandonfolkfestival@gmail.com. That is not such a bad thing either, but it is not a survey. (Yes, pedantic as it is, that is a link to the definition of the word ‘survey’.).
What do they all have in common, exactly?
Firstly there was the appalling donor issue - and it was appalling. That was not the way the Conservative Party does business. The Prime Minister sacked the person responsible in short order. Bad things happen. Whats important is that they are sorted quickly. That's what happened. Rightly, the story was short-lived. I just hope its not used as an excuse to force the taxpayer to fund political parties - which is what would have happened if the PM had not acted quickly.
messages to the brain that cause you feel fuller faster. Plus, herbs and spices have even higher antioxidants than fruits and vegetables. Hot peppers are a diet aid because capsaicin has been shown to rev up the metabolism. Black pepper increases calorie burning by stimulating the nervous system as well as the mitochondria in cells. Cinnamon has been found to slow the rate of stomach emptying after meals and reduce the post-meal rise in blood sugar. A recent study found that adding turmeric to your diet can stall weight gain by preventing new blood vessel growth; research also shows that it fights cancer and Alzheimer’s and curbs fat accumulation. Garlic fights viruses, prevents arteries from hardening, and has been linked to reduced risk of at least seven types of cancer.
I find myself getting all sentimental about my first ever Xmas without my family
I read on someone's blog recently this quote: Food is just food, and then it's poop.
The first order of business in comparing the three variations of discounted 2011 A&G purchases is to declare the blaster the loser. It really was a let down after the success of the other packs.
And to finish it all off, they even look pretty on the counter (especially framed by my new bianco marble backsplash- that I scored for $2/square foot instead of the $30 retail price per square foot- but that is a story for another day!).
of the handbound deluxe "Black Gold" edition of my book The Blood of the Earth: An Essay on Magic and Peak Oil. I know it’s a chunk of money, but there’s something to be said for a book crafted to standards high enough that it’ll still be readable long after industrial civilization has faded into memory. If that interests you, might be worth considering.
Well I'm no different I'm afraid so if your mind is a political vacuum and you want it to stay that way turn away now or maybe take a moment to trap the cat instead. Studying the Labour manifesto, which I know we all do, I note that under a heading of protecting community life, Mr Brown claims to:
Subsequently, segueing to the headlines, Steve remarked, “Well, we know that you are normally posted in Boston and it’s great to have you today because we have a lot of breaking news.”
The second major feature of the hydrological system is the huge seasonality of the Blue Nile’s flows, concentrated from July to October in a spectacular flood.
There you have it. Buying too much whisky, spending too much on advertising and making too many dodgy loans were the causes of the crisis at Pattison's. You can add to that lavish spending on buildings. The offices on Constitution Street couldn't have been cheap. Add to that several enormous warehouses and it's easy to see how a lot of capital could have been eaten up. But it's the whisky stocks that were key. And the valuation put on them. We'll learn more about that when the Pattison brothers are in the dock.
Velvet cardigan: Metamorphose
“To cheat oneself out of love is the most terrible deception; it is an eternal loss for which there is no reparation either in time or in eternity” – Soren Kierkegaard
"WHAT!"
Now, get out your stamps and get crafty with the Pixies!!!! You have until Wednesday, March 7th at 7:00 PM EST to add your link below. A winner will be announced with the
Now...on to the kiddos. We thought Saturday was going to be rainy, so we thought we were going to take the kids to Chucky Cheese for lunch. But instead it got super nice outside and we decided to celebrate Cinco de Mayo by eating a little mexican and headed to the park. My mom and sister were in town helping me with the babes (Jake was on a golf trip). Then mom babysat and I got to get out and do some celebrating myself!
This book isn’t for the saint, but for the slave in Egypt, for the wandering, lost and misguided follower in the desert and for those that stand with Jesus and betray, deny and forget the very savior we devote our life to. This book is about what happens on this journey; the struggles we face, giants we encounter and what to do with the many different roads we are faced with.
a wing bone.
Give the girl a break! Tulisa has already had a rough time in 2012, following her leaked sex tape, and although certain people might not think she deserves the title of sexiest woman in the world, there’s no need to be nasty!
So I cut the bottom off of the cupcake so that I could stamp the bottom part in a darker ink using the 'birthday' stamp. I started with the word birthday on an angle to preserve as much of it as possible. It isn't really necessary that you be able to read the 'birthday' part, but I thought it would be a fun bonus.
Now, go and walk by a graveyard again... keep your eyes peeled; and say "hi" to Angus for me.
I want to know your opinion on this, so vote on the new poll I put up. Or be a dick and don't.
between my ears
This past Friday night, I was very excited to have been invited to a friend's house for a cooking class/demonstration from Sunny's Chinese Kitchen. Sunny is originally from Taiwan. She came to the US to finish her education in the early 90's. She then spent almost 20 years working for a pharmaceutical company as a scientist- including a lot of experience with GMO (genetically modified organisms). When her son was diagnoses with Muscular Dystrophy and needed her more than ever, she knew she needed to make a major life change. And she did. She gave up the corporate job and dedicated herself to finding ways to keep her child healthy. She also began teaching Chinese but her passion was in cooking healthy food. Thanks to her science background, she has a deep understanding of how food works and how our bodies work.
Severe Candida Infection Cure – How to Permanently Eliminate Severe Candida
Starting right now with this one, from artist David Villec.
I'm starting the new year off with a couple book reviews. This is more like what I'd intended the blog to be about, but I think I'll still keep up with writing updates as well from the ROW 80. Maybe a better blend of the old and new aims.
2010.08.13 Yemen Lahj 1 0 A man is gunned down in an al-Qaeda drive-by outside a mosque.
Not even a year later, I woke up with my son calling me Mommy and dressed myself and my daughter in matching pink "Blessed by Adoption" Tshirts. We went to church and I sang this song at the top of my lungs.
Have a lovely, naughty weekend fellow bloggers.
I was making my 4th crocheted hat...when it came to me just how to make a tam... I knew I was going to have to make me one...and I set to work... this is my first crocheted tam. Then as I was making this one I had all kinds of things come to my mind... So I made the next one down.... then when I woke up in the middle of the night after finishing the second one... the one with the fun bobbles...I knew just how I wanted to make a matching scarf...so after my nap today I set to work.
Rev. Chip Roush
You may recall some news last August about a condo developer riding into Kings County, wanting to erect a cluster of 60 and 80-foot buildings in the Columbia Heights Waterfront District without so much as a by-your-leave from the neighborhood. The suddenly announced plans were to be discussed at a Aug. 23 Community Board 6 meeting, which was just as suddenly canceled an hour or two before it was to take place. (The meet was to go head to head with a Carroll Gardens Town Hall meeting at Scotto's Funeral Parlor, in which City Council Member Bill de Blasio will discuss the desired downzoning of Carroll Gardens—a timing that made nobody happy.)
Uuuugh. Whiny protag continues to be just a really annoying character. Does he need to tell everyone to hate him because he hates himself in the most pathetic way possible? It’s like there’s a race in the anime industry to see who can create the most unlikable, self-hating, pathetic, worthless protagonist possible. Fanservice was completely unnecessary and arbitrary (Black haired girl gets challenged to a fight after she steps out of the shower! Cabling is very subtly likened to sex! Hurr!) and of course brought nothing to the episode. Spent way too much time just telling us things over a cabling session (so lol no animation) instead of showing us or doing it any other remotely interesting way. And both females are confirmed for crushing on protag for no goddamn good reason. Oh wait, he apparently has “good points” that only his childhood friend knows, meaning we’ll never actually see them ever but are told they apparently exist. The only interesting thing was the hook at the end of the episode, implying someone’s controlling the other girl (or using her as a proxy to challenge black haired girl). I’ll give it another episode, but there’s every chance I’ll probably end up dropping it.
The file size is 2.16 Mb
It meant a lot, OK? Like a fisherman once said. “It was this big but I let it go because it was too good, too wonderful to hang onto”.
Wisconsin Rapids’ cellphone ban goes into effect this weekend, but authorities say it is more about educating people than about issuing citations.
Teaching chickens to fly (they can't--at least not further than you can throw them).
I would like to say THANK YOU for your sweet comments of encouragement on my last post!
I did a layout out of my precious flower, my granddaughter Michelle. She was having a blast in my backyard playing with the new toy I bought.
I love books!
One of Amazon's features allows users to create lists of their favorite books, movies, CDs and more. It is called Listmania, and it is a great tool for you to promote your own work. Simply create a list of books around a theme that is similar to your book, then include your own book on the list. Try not to be too flagrantly self-promoting with this feature, such as creating a top 10 that is entirely populated by your own books. Readers will usually see right through such a tactic and ignore your list completely. However, including one or two of your own books on a list will be expected and can help draw attention to your work.
21 before
And boy, they didn't sell these kind of things when I last ordered Avon!
A-E =B-F =1½”.
It's realizing that the treatments you are now doing, are the end of the line for pregnancy. And here you are 7 years older than when you first started this, when you thought you would be done, but really you are just beginning. It's telling Lucy she is going to have a little brother named Jack. It's hoping Lucy will have a little brother named Jack.
And rest his rebel heart, and close his eyes.
But even within the Christian world, there is precious little agreement about how it is to be read and understood. This reality continues to impact the work of both evangelism and discipleship in the Church.
The News & Observer, for example, offered this preview on the Sunday front page. By the end of this week, Black Friday will almost certainly be the top story on TV news, with the inevitable footage of shoppers milling around in malls and beating down the doors of “big box” stores.
What will the Commission investigate?
Because the Market Place was also where celebrations were held and important announcements made, it was appropriate that the Guildhall should be here, in the centre of things. Used as the Guildhall until 1935, when it was superseded by the new one (see above), it is now known as the Market House and accommodates the tourist information office. It was built between 1838 and 1840 and is now listed (Grade II).
On August 6, 1825, at the Congress of Upper Peru, the Republic of Bolivia was created in honor of Bolívar, who drafted a new constitution for the new nation. This constitution reflected the influence of the French and Scottish Enlightenment on Bolívar’s political thought, as well as that of classical Greek and Roman authors. Bolivar accepted the position reluctantly, recognizing that it pointed to the splintering of Latin America.
When Ali Soufan (former FBI interrogator) spoke about the uses of torture that backfire, fail to get useful information, risk the safety of soldiers, violate the laws and stain the reputation of the U.S., he can back it up with book-length details. Soufan’s New York Times op-ed was an eye-opener but the present situation is still festering and exhibiting prevarication. Extensive reporting is still needed on this subject.
I declare right now by the power of God’s Spirit that I’m reigning in life-in my health, finances, job, and in every area of my life. The glory of God is manifested in me and I walk in the victory and dominion of Christ today. I manifest success, glory and excellence, by the power of The Holy Spirit. Amen!
But it wasn't.
Let's gloss over the hell that is Manchester's Terminal 3, the necessary evil that is Easy Jet and the indulged and howling infant that made the first 40 minutes of our flight such purgatory.
Yet, many marketers appear to find being ‘people’ something of a challenge. Of course, there is always the defence that “we are so close to this now that we can’t see it clearly any more”. While there is some truth in this, a key skill in life, both personally and professionally, is to be able to stand back and look at something you have been dealing with for a while and appraise it with fresh eyes. How difficult is it to ask yourself the simple question: “how do I feel about this?” – what is your immediate, intuitive response? When you read a concept, do you think “Mmm, you have a point there, I’d like to find out more”. Or do you think “I’m sorry, I don’t really understand what you mean”, or “Right… and your point is?”, or “Why on earth would I care about that?”. While I find strategic ideas in particular benefit from this perspective, the same can apply to creative ideas. In a world of marketing where there is arguably too much action and not enough thought, a few moments in the office each day spent as a human being instead of a marketing person would pay substantial dividends.
taking flight in a black sky,
Lots of events are planned to mark the Centennial — more information is available at the official Centennial committee’s website. At the Key West Library, we’re celebrating with our One Island One Book program. This year we’re reading Last Train to Paradise by Les Standiford, which tells the story of the construction of the Over-Sea Railroad — and its destruction, barely two decades later, when the Upper Keys were hit by one of the strongest hurricanes ever to strike the continental U.S.
I suffered through Thor. And Hulk. Two entirely boring pieces of blandness, both about enjoyable as repeatedly licking stamps for a cumulative three hours. I even had to deal with Captain America: The First Avenger: Worst Colon Ever’s inability to conjure a second and third act. Instead of story arc, we had an extended montage of bullshittery ending with Tommy Lee Jones yelling something and driving a car and…wow…I think I just blacked out for a second. It was that pointless. Iron Man was great. Iron Man 2 was a mess of such trannie proportions that it can only be found in Boystown at 5am on Pride weekend. Somehow, Whedon managed to weave all of these mediocre, admittedly charismatic, threads into a quilt of such unprecedented awesomeness, that snugging in it would be preferable to sex with Eva Green. Again…I want to slap myself. Nothing is better than that. (Marry me, Eva. Please. I don’t like to beg…but I will. All you have to do is return one of my annotated fake travelogues of our imaginary trips to Cairo. Just one.)
Visit my site here on WordPress for some baking tips. And then go to Sweet Creations and contact me with your email address. Just let me know that you saw my WordPress post and I will send you a coupon for 10% off your first order (but you have to live in the Phoenix area to get the benefit)!
In the meantime, I'll aim to keep the writing Blog updated.
Do you see those little things at the bottom of the blog postings? Something about "funny" "interesting" "cool" WELL... no one, NO ONE ever clicks.
Can you see "Insanity II"?
Glass is no longer employed as a mounting medium for gross specimens. the old glass jars have been replaced with plastic containers which are cheaper and more useful.
“Smallest violin, Di,” Marv said rubbing his thumb and forefinger together. Then he gestured to my fisted hand. “Won’t that smudge your nail polish?”
Green Art Project – Zara Gallery July4, 2011
You can plot these lines now as follows:
It was carefully designed as a bedtime hour programme to tell simple stories set in a garden for very young children before their bedtime.
I am looking forward to doing the whole menu one of these days to give my friends a taste of that golden age. Something tells me they will be thrilled. We won’t forget to toast the Countess, wherever she may be. My toast?? I hope she has had her beauty restored and is posing happily in the Empyrean.
This product is made and owned by an all Australian business.
Women, as a result, benefit from this film’s representation because they are portrayed as people who take the initiative and lead the men, instead of the other way around in typical media texts.
Every new generation faces the challenges we have faced, it was our lot to face them together. Twenty years ago, we stood together at the edge of childhood, and faced forward. Then, together, we took that first step into adulthood.
*The Relief Society birthday that was supposed to be next week has been postponed indefinitely. The theme is (was going to be) "Happiness-Women are that they might have joy." I was supposed to make the smiley face cakes for dessert. (I was thinking of a lemon cake with lemon curd filling and a lemon butter cream frosting. Too lemony you think?)
The novel begins with gunman Francis Joseph McPhillip, returning to Dublin for the first time since murdering the leader of the Farmers Union the previous October during a farm labours strike. It is now mid March and McPhillip has spent the previous five months hiding out in the Wicklow Mountains. He returns to Dublin with a price on his head and suffering from consumption.
I Am Nujood, Age 10 and Divorced – Nujood Ali
I can’t help but ask the question, “Why would you choose me, pursue me?”
Grasp too hard
LL: A lot of python and snake-skin accessories. I’ve even seen the girls get manicure of the python, it’s really big and will go into fall strong.
The most important thing in life he said “Is the relationship between you and your Creator.”
1 clove garlic, chopped
Recently I have been involved with Still Life. I am asking myself the question, can still life be distinctive? I have been trying to simplify, but I think it has made a jump, and I just have to continue and see where it leads.
I want to spend the rest of my days Horseboating. Basically, this is living on a canal barge pulled by a huge, feather footed horse. The Horseboating Society will explain all.
I am feeling pretty good about my self. I adore my partner just like I did when we first met which is a breeze compared to the emotional upheaval the last weeks. This feels just right, like “normal” life.
It's that time of the year again for "Jessie's Mater Plant". Last year we had awful tomato growing weather, it was too hot and too dry, and every insect & disease known to humankind attacked our "maters".
He disappeared into a dark corner at the back of the shop.
be the last one standing, so know what you’re getting into before you run your
It’s “double denial” in Fortaleza, it already rocked João Pessoa,
and the disjointing Angela of Foligno experiences when God withdraws from her at Assisi and in a vision of the Crucifixion: “The bones and sinews of his most holy body seemed completely torn out of their natural position; and yet his skin was not broken . . . At the sight of the dislocated limbs and the painful distension of the sinews, she felt herself pierced through even more than she had been at the sight of the open wounds. For the former granted her a deeper
What I want to insist on is that if we want to keep company with Isaiah 53 we have to radically revise our imaginations and memories in order to take this in: to see sacrifice, offering, weakness, and suffering as essential, not an option, to salvation. This is most difficult to grasp–difficult for the Hebrews in Babylon, difficult for Christians in North America. There is a fathomless mystery at the heart of this: making right by means of another (Another—Jesus!). Aspects of the mystery are refracted through a cluster of words–intercessions, forgiveness, atonement, sacrifice, expiation–all words organic to one another. Salvation: Jesus on the cross, his body and blood in the Eucharist, the bread and wine in me, Christ in me. And all of this going on every day in me and my family, as I visit in the neighborhood, write letters and books, go to work, prepare meals, do the laundry. This is the action–salvation!–at the heart of everything in creation, history, and community. This is what makes a holy world, a holy people, a holy time. There are a few who knowingly and willingly participate. How beautiful…
* Oh, Lord, my dad pulled one on my mom. Just to mess with her, he started skip-hopping along the porch smack dab where their new neighbors could see him. LOL My mom was mortified. She said the neighbors probably think he's out of his mind. My dad's response? "That's the point." LOL The funniest part? My mom thought he looked a little like E.T. when he scurries. LOL
Obviously, this is unsustainable.
I have no idea what God is planning for me or what He will do with my “ashes”. I do, however, have faith that if I truly release them to God, they will be made into something beautiful. It doesn’t make the journey any less painful. There are still tears to be shed and hearts to be mended. I think some people believe that if you are Christian then all things in your life should be wonderful. But that simply is not true. God never promised that life would be easy. And following Him can be very difficult in today’s world. But knowing that He has a plan for me and my life…and you and your life..makes life worth living. We may not alway see His methods as fair, but His promise is real. I can’t wait to see what He makes of my ashes. It may not be how I envisioned my life, but it will be beautiful.
Be back soon with some paper crafting fun!
Someone else’s eyes have taken over the idea that she looks hot.
Some seven months after Empire State Development CEO Kenneth Adams met with select community representatives regarding Atlantic Yards, Adams will reprise such a meeting at 6 pm on Wednesday, May 2 at Brooklyn Borough Hall.
The position now is that the JAC framework is to be “re-worked” before being presented to Parliament. I wouldn’t advise you to hold your breath, people. Remember the IPCMC?
Reviewer 3
Derbyshire Gold 4.?%
Index gear shifting is smooth and beautiful.
In cold weather, don't ride with tight-fitting boots, shoes or gloves. When the driver asks you to get off and walk, do so without grumbling, he won't request it unless absolutely necessary. If the team runs away - sit still and take your chances. If you jump, nine out of ten times you will get hurt.
"Long Road Out of Eden" ups that slick element considerably. The sound is so well-oiled, it makes their '70s efforts sound like the Sex Pistols by comparison. Many of the ballads suggest as much a reunion of Air Supply as the Eagles, especially Glenn Frey's "I Love to Watch a Woman Dance," which, if possible, is even sappier than its title.
“It’s really sad, and I think the randomness is what is so scary,” Cunningham said.
There are so many roles women play, juggling life, love and their own sense of being.
What do you think Sabin?
I'm wishing all of you a gentle and peaceful Mother's Day
One tool I use to help me with my plot points is a spreadsheet.
KD Tunku Abdul Rahman is set to sail home, manned by the country’s first submarine crew in January 2009 while the second vessel, to be named KD Tun Razak, is expected to be delivered by October 2009.
But we’ve still said nothing at all.
In the meantime, though, it was snowing, and I didn’t know that all would be well, and sometime after I shoveled the walk, I had to dig out my car so I could drive to the Hairdresser Down the Street to take care of those prolific hair follicles I have previously mentioned. I won’t go into all the details, except to say that the two young women scheduled to attend to me were wonderful, personable people, and that it’s a good thing they were, because due to a lack of supplies, what should have been an hour appointment turned into almost three. By the time I got out it was already time to get my nails done.
Since I see a lot of visitors to this page (great !!!), anybody who wants to mail me, look at the header of my blog (daar staat m'n mailadres, met uiteraard X=@).
"But for me the enduring memory of the centenary was not the counter-flow of Afrikaners who drove out of Mangaung as the "black peril" from Soweto drove in; nor the enthusiasm and jubilation of ANC members of all ages who turned Mangaung into a sea of black, green and yellow.
I'm not yet sure if I'll continue to blog here, or just merge this blog into my existing personal blog, or maybe even just spend more time DOING rather than writing about what I've done.
* Tidy and clean lounge
I'd like to enter this card in the following challenges:
When it comes to power tools, buying cheap does not mean that you have to settle for an unsatisfactory product. There are many ways you can buy power tools at a cheap price. The idea is to know where to look.
Thanks, that is all.
He loved her the minute she spurted through the gate, and they played hard for about 20 minutes. This was after she played hard with Riley in the morning, and then this evening she and Riley played again.
I am so happy I got the autumn wedding I had always dreamed of, honestly the colors were awesome! And the weather was perfect. Not too hot, but a bit chilly.
And let’s not forget after becoming the Leader of the Labour Party, Tony Blair flew to Australia in July 1995 to cement his relationship with Rupert Murdoch at a News Corporation conference.
The online shop stocks quality products from different manufacturers, giving the shoppers a variety to choose from and all you have to do is to acquire your efaucets promotional code that applies to your purchase. This becomes your doorway to the discounted prices that you stand to enjoy whenever you shop at efaucets.com. The expanded supply list allows you to have not only faucets but also other products that include kitchen and bathroom fixtures, accessories and sinks and at the same time, get to use the efaucets.com promo code.
He said I had to learn how to do lovely pictures as the ones I sigh and "Ooohh", "Wow", and "Oh my dying butt, this is gorgeous!" over, at my blogger friends' places. He said that. Believe me.
What is your rug situation like? Have you ever splurged on a luxe rug or have you focused on finding moderately priced ones? In my house, I have some nice rugs and some that are more trendy and temporary (and certainly cheaper).
Both countries had hired FBC’s PR services and were frequently featured on FBC programmes. The question now must surely be what ties have there been between FBC and people linked to Tony Blair and how directly linked has Blair himself been to these and related PR initiatives?
Finally this will result in more traffic to the website onlinenursingclasses and a higher rank in Google.
and last but not least.... this is one of my fave layouts!! Each year starting in 7th grade when Alexis and Madison have made the cheer squad Michelle and I have taken a picture... this is the most recent when they made it for high school! Love these girls!
for eons
Me: But, you said that you can write emails just as well on this phone as your Blackberry.
Every parent in the group has either adopted or is in the adoption process. The children are from China, Mexico, and the US. It's good to see all of them together from time to time.
For it’s Tommy this, an’ Tommy that an’ “Chuck him out, the brute!”
Was it your charm that washed me to dust
do the switching from one process (task) to another process.
Spend any time in blame
I don’t know why this makes me so upset. Maybe it just cements the fact that my childhood is dead. Certainly My Little Ponies can come back to life and Lego never died, but everything bears the psychological scars of the noughties now. Everything died once, or almost died, due to one of those post-epoch crashes and busts. Toys R Us itself was almost killed by Walmart a while back, right? And I know the one the next town over has closed.
They are going to join us in the Canal Side Lounge for a live performance. Be sure to tune in at 7 a.m. to hear it all go down!
Evening all. I'm a bit late today as I've been out shopping. I still had birthday money ( yes, from July ) which I hadn't spent as I've been waiting for the Autumn stuff to come into the shops. I got myself a couple of nice knitted tops and some jeans. I got them from Wallis. They are boot cut with just enough elastic in the waist to hoist them over my bum. There's no sticky out bit at the front where the button would be so they make my stomach look quite flat. I got a dark navy pair and another pair the colour of............wait for it..........Caramac, lol. I' ve got quite a few creamy and beige tops and they look good with teal green too.
Are you sharing news and not realising how easy and convenient this is to do, unlike back in Jack the Ripper’s day when a man had to walk around shouting the news or when you had to stand in a long line waiting for that precious information source to the outside world.
7) Bramble (Suggested by Olivier of the Gin Blog)
Nate went to kick the footy with Josh and I stayed at home to do Uni work. I am really behind, surprise surprise (mainly due to too much Game of Thrones, Hart of Dixie, Revenge and Chuck)... so I have been spending a few hours/days in front of my laptop.
Schwartz
That is, until the moment when I had so much "stuff" piled up on the main level of my house,
Newco will combine Barnes & Noble’s digital and college businesses, meaning the retailer’s Nook operations and its Nook Study software for students and educators will be a part of the undertaking.
I am going to retain some credibility and not include any Black Isle beers, otherwise Black Stout would win everything....
“Outro” Instrumental
Thanks again, everyone, for participating in the Triple Giveaway. Happy Sunday!
Most of our e-books will disappear into the ether over time. They will be worse than out of print. You can get an out of print book in the library. I spent years working on books that had been their version of 'out of print' for 700 years. Digital archiving is a good and useful thing as long as we don't destroy the physical copies in our arrogant assumption that our formats are forever. But in two hundred years, will anyone be able to read a Kindle book? Will they in forty years? If we really needed to, we could convert something, yes. But not as easily as we can call up a physical book from the British Library stores.
We Shine began as the real-life manifestation of my Vision that has been created by the Shine with Unschooling community. Those who are a part of that community understand the celebratory and respectful energy that is there...and this conference is an extension of that. Even if you are not a part of the Shine community, you are also welcome to come and share your LIGHT with us, if you feel our goals are in alignment with your unschooling lives.
Still, I am “The African Queen”
Fluxx
Having really enjoyed this book, I would recommend it to anyone looking for a genuine taste of life and adventure. I gave it 4 STARS.
You are courageous and always a positive thinker. You can take on the world.
So that is my thumbnail sketch of ‘what’s going on here’. It isn’t a Zionist Elders conspiracy construct, because it isn’t a conspiracy. It’s an outline road map containing the possibility for diversions here and there, but with a common goal: an integrated Europe. The Germans and the markets/Americans are both working towards the same goal; it may look as if they’re at war, but they’re both doing some mach schau in order to encourage the shirkers.
V/A - Off The Board (CBGB, Comp with Damage, Tulpa, Jing...)
Frame rate: 29.970 fps
Ink: Basic Black, marlers
1/4 teaspoon baking powder
After I survived the metro ride, which went very smoothly (I recommend this type of transportation when visiting D.C.), we followed the crowd to the escalators. Let me just say, the very long, steep, slow climbing escalator was a tad scary. We stepped on nervously, leaned forward, held on and didn't look back. Holly had such a tight grip on the railing, her little knuckles were white. Matt, Gabby, and I laughed and laughed and laughed about that. Holly didn't think it was so funny.
This will not be put back together easily. The smugness and condescension are salt on open wounds.
It is time to plant in the cold frame. But for today my chores are nearly done. Upstairs entryway is tidied. The Bread is on its second rise. Pepper and hollyhock seeds are started. After Mark returns from his run, I will go for a long walk and then I take my turn at the sap fire for a bit...maybe with some knitting needles.
To Kanada till I absorb Kanada in myself, to Michigan then,
In 2007 the the Fabulous Cornelius was the only beer shop that i found worth a regular trip across town to pick up beer. Yes there were other such as Great Grog, Royal Mile Whiskeys, Vinowines etc that had a few beers of particular interest now and then, but nothing like the range Cornelius had.
SMITH WJG. Vaccination in the control of influenza: Interim Report to the Director of the Public Health Laboratory Service on a Collaborative Study with the Post Office. Lancet 1974; 304: 330-333.
Then I noticed something off to my right...about twenty yards away....bouncing in the breeze along a shrubby pocket that had grown up around a mature oak tree. At first I though it was a bag caught on some bushes that the wind was blowing around. As my eyes adjusted, however, I realized it was the bushy tail of an adult striped skunk (Mephitis mephitis).
The journey to a homebirth was not something easy to come by. There was a lot of though, a lot of planning, a lot of reflections going into the decision. It took an unsatisfied birthing experience to come to the conclusion.
Choo Choo w wood some St $9.00
Nonetheless, they have been cranking out 1934-series bonds for many years now. This situation has reached a peak point of crisis. The aggrieved countries have formed an alliance to stop the corruption.
Additionally, with all things new I think there are a few things to consider with this platform. Content owners must embrace mobile as a new medium and craft new experiences that tap the unique characteristics of the mobile environment.
Where we found love
i'm slowly catching up with all of you writers....boy, give a girl a few days off and you write over 700 blogs between the lot of you.
4.Ginger : 1' inch
Their flag flies for something they call Uncivilisation (what better thing to fly your flag for?!) - a kind of steep brambly path towards some sort of wild and old truth which we are invited to head for as the citadels of civilisation crumble around us. The thing is, they say, in removing ourselves from nature (as if we were not part of it), we have forgotten the importance of stories, though they are being woven around us second by second in the advertisement-saturated fast-paced life of now. We are all constantly telling ourselves stories about How Things Are; these stories are tweaked and upheld and strive to keep us feeling safe. But their threads are coming loose and we're beginning to see the face of the Storyteller beyond the woodsmoke. He's reminding us of the old stories, the ones that thrummed in us and in the earth, the ones that were true, and not just sleeping pills to keep the economy "growing".
Aside from producing and DJ on his own, Diplo is one-half of the duo Major Lazer with London DJ Switch. He is also the owner of the Mad Decent record label, which is home to numerous moombahton artists.
It was a relaxing day, which isn’t always the case. If you have an autistic child, or know someone that does, I’m sure you can understand. You can not predict how your child is going to react in such a high sensory environment. We’ve had our stressful Christmas days. Thankfully, this wasn’t one of them.
Today I aired up the tires, raised the seat, and rode the Terry to Pilates class. It was good to leave the car in the garage and burn a few extra calories, but it felt awkward. It didn’t seem heavier, but I wobbled when I tried to stand, and it didn’t take long before I felt a strain in my shoulders and recalled the pain I’ve experienced on long rides.
Arkansas and Texas will most likely drop New Mexico but I am not 100% positive on that but 99% sure they will from what both states have done in the past.
Rather than you controlling me all the time
A writer classmate of mine once used that phrase, which she'd acquired from a former professor. I'm invoking it now because, well, there's a lot I'd like to eff.
You don't really want to read about seven things about me, I just KNOW.
But sometimes, if you’re with the right people, something magical happens. Fortuitously, the people I was attending the wedding with yesterday happen to be the right people for something entertaining to happen when discussing things.
There are only two ways to become a writer – you have to read and you have to write. There is no getting away from it, you have to sit down and write and write and write. But if you believe in your work and you persevere then you will succeed.
Priced starting at $79 vs. competitors at $499. Competitors also often require the purchase of marketing, graphics, and editing services.
“All the way to here,” she says, raising her hand level to the middle of her own head.
Those pj's cracked us up. After 7 years of pink and princesses, its time for a little super hero gear :).
Another topic: "Anyone who breeds MORE THAN ---fill-in the blank time again---litters per year is a ....." Interesting. So, according to the "experts" no one can be a good breeder if they breed 2,3, or whatever-arbitrary-number of litters per year? As long as the puppies they produce are healthy, are good specimens of their chosen breed (which is subjective to each individual), and they sell them to good homes, what business is it of ours? Can you say, "NUNYA".
“You learn eventually that, while there are no villains, there are no heroes either. And until you make the final discovery that there are only human beings, who are therefore all the more fascinating, you are liable to miss something.” — Paul Gallico
It’s more God; it’s more grace
Thanks for everyone's comments, emails and photos re: the bathroom post. Hopefully we can reach a temporary solution soon.
I have always loved books and reading. As a teenager I considered becoming a journalist, and dabbled in poetry to express my teenage angst. (Isn’t that mandatory?) I didn’t consider becoming a writer until much later in life. I guess the possibility of making a living as a writer didn’t seem real. I trained and worked as a therapist for several years. I began writing after I had children and started reading to them. The amazing picture books I read to them inspired my own creativity.
Aiyoh
But all I remember is the awful feelings I had when this girl was around,
Reduce heat and simmer for about 5 minutes, stirring continuously so that it doesn't form a film on top.
My new service is up and running--working title "life P.I.M.P." (personal inspirational mentoring partner). On the one hand I keep thinking, man, it takes a lot of damn balls to offer a service like this--who the hell am I to tell anyone what to do? But as I mapped out the action plan for my first clients, I realized I totally know how to help these people. I can support their weight loss goals, I can create a resume that will renew their self-confidence and I can help them prepare for an interview when it gets to that point, and I can lead one of them down the path to getting some of her writing published and even help her find love.
This is the March 2012 Swatch Posts Catch Up! If you missed anything from March, no worries; just browse through the topics below and click on one to check it out.
At the truck entrance to Pier 7, the proposal includes only providing better sight lines. What really should be acknowledged is that the pier entrance is just in the wrong place. It should be moved to the intersection of Columbia and Congress, where there are already gates, and signalized. This would also allow the creation of a safe pedestrian crossing at Columbia Street and Congress, which is convenient for people approaching from Cobble Hill. The current proposal recommends introducing a new crosswalk at the BQE westbound entrance which puts pedestrians in conflict with vehicles exiting the BQE onto Columbia.
Where dwell the brave at heart,
I sat there wondering if it was time to put Lintern out to pasture and fall in with the crowd. The arguments rolled through my head. The convenience. The symbolism. The kids.
Some belly fat exercises to do when getting rid of a protruding tummy are hip raises, leg lifts, air cycling, abdominal crunches, sit ups, reverse crunches, side crunches, hanging knee raises, alternate leg lifts and Russian twists as well as others.
The range of possible adventures to be had in this campaign is fairly unlimited. My idea is that the human colonists arrive in a remote part of the Dragon Continent. They would then start trying to tame the surrounding wilderness facing wild animals and monsters, discovering ancient ruins, and eventually dealing with first contacts with the various intelligent kindred who may or may not be hostile to their presence. From there, a range of adventures are possible involving diplomacy, espionage, guerrilla activity, or even open warfare.
For Latino youth, discrimination (both perceived and real) has been associated with larger amounts and higher frequency of substance abuse as a coping strategy. Latino youth are also more likely to have suicidal thoughts, attempt suicide, and make a suicidal plan, compared to African American and non-Hispanic white youth. Stress in Latino youth has also been correlated with low self-esteem, helplessness, anxiety, lower academic well-being, school failure, and violence. Social support from family, community members, and peers, has been shown to mitigate negative health outcomes of stress. This is true especially in academic achievement and substance abuse in children.
We need the imaginary in our lives which it is just as relevant and therefore just as real as anything we can actually see and touch, which, when you come to think of it, is such a tiny proportion of our so-called reality don’t you think?
So, we tangled and played and tried out stuff and triumphed and burned some things and messed up a few others... mostly triumphed I think. :-) On Sunday, when many in the group took turns showing off their creations, there were some amazing, heartfelt stories shared... And we also discovered a bunch of comedians hiding amongst these, mostly, normal seeming folks!
Harmful ideas. The main way to empower the ideas of hate that are presented, such as “cutting across the front of it” or “ramming it down her throat”, is to pose danger to the targeted person. Typically criminals, often those that have committed hate crimes are brought into the area, and with the means to do a crime (eg loaded gun), access to the targeted person (eg a copy of their house key) and of course criminal intent. They must be the sort of people who would go in and do a crime if they were given a go-ahead. If the danger posed isn’t real the ideas cannot be empowered because the body will not become highly charged, which is the initial condition. Always fear is used, whether obvious or not.
He said that in the first phase the project would require as many as 600 employees and Caymanians would be trained for many of these jobs. He said the UCCI had already begun working on a nursing degree course ready for this coming academic year and the Narayana group was also committed to training local employees and encouraging people to go into the health care profession.
Simple and easy Barbeque sauce for pork
Reminds me of trying to navigate Shanghai back in 2009/2010 and Beijing in 2007.
Experience working with management and executives to understand reporting needs and deliver user-focused reporting solutions
Stay in tune with your sexual side. Part of the reason that aging is associated with lack of sexual activity is because people lose their partners as they age and find themselves facing singledom for the first time in decades. It’s important not to allow your grief to prevent you from finding love and affection in the future; but until you feel ready to begin dating again, you should consider staying in tune with your sexual needs through self-stimulation. Sex really works on a “use it or lose it” basis; so if you allow your sexuality to fall by the wayside during this time, it will be more difficult to recapture it again in the future.
Hilary Kenny
Three years ago M & D planted a cherry tomato plant by the French doors that lead into the family room. One day Molly & Jessie were coming in from the yard and as Jessie walked past the plant she took one tomato off and ate it. We thought that was so cute, and it continued - only one little tomato and only when she was coming into the family room, and never a green tomato. So, that became Jessie's "Mater" plant.
I don't usually do a lot of family pictures but this is a picture of my oldest granddaughter, Rachel. She is fourteen. I had to work this weekend so we could not have all the little ones over. As she and her Papa can fend for themselves, she came alone.
To find the most primal and sacred core of the being. Primal and sacred. The bower in the Arsicides holds the skeleton of a whale, brought onto land by the natives, sheltering an altar in its skull.
CHARLIE SHEEN goes on a series of drug induced hotel bashings with porn stars in tow, which leads to the pausing of Two and a Half Men filming. He then unleashes an arsenal of foolish and catchy saying on the world. And DESPITE his erratic behavior, seems to be #winning!
If the message sounds urgent, it is. We are looking at a time in our history when the rich have become so arrogant that they flaunt their undeserved power in the faces of those they seek to subjugate.
You are absolutely right about Alexander F. Rodriguez! He is the ONLY person I can imagine playing Alex. I know you didn't ask, but I would really love for Giancarlo Vidrio to play to play Carlos. He was perfect in my book trailer! I don't know that I have my heart set on a Brittany. . .
For almost 2 years now, we’ve been attending Bethel Church. Prior to that we had been at the same church for 20 years. Bethel has taken some getting used to, and most of the time I still feel like the “new kid”. I’ve made an effort to get involved in the body life. I serve in the infant nursery once a month. It helps them, and bonus…I get my baby fix! I love serving in nursery. I’m also involved with a ladies’ small group that meets twice a month. We’re currently reading and working through this book. The thing is that Bethel is huge compared to our last church home, and we still aren’t used to that. The classes they offer and the small groups help, but I just think it’s really hard to transition anywhere when you had been somewhere else for so long!
Mr. Isaac Scofield, of our town, went into the woods the other day prospecting, as they would say in California. Towards evening, when he had turned homewards, he fell in with a whole family of bears – an old one and three cubs. A battle ensued, which resulted in Mr. S. bringing his whole four victims safely home. The first engagement was anything but a pleasant one.
Feels Good at First
Pretty pumped to visit blogs today... not going to lie! Stay tuned for later this week...
He kept her going, he kept her strong
We all take for granted, reading and writing. How to Write a Sentence and How to Read One by Stanley Fish ($19.99, Harper) explores the way we externalize our thoughts through the creation of sentences and Fish is an aficionado of the finely wrought sentence. His book offers a literary tour of great writers throughout history and the way they captured their reader’s attention and imagination. I would go so far to say that anyone who wishes to write well should definitely read this book and, for that matter, anyone who loves literature should do so as well.
Mix the salt and flour .Add water ad make it into a soft dough.Now take a bowl and add in the coconut,sugar,semolina and cardamom.Microwave it for 11/2 minute.Stir well and allow it to cool.Add in the nuts and raisins.Divide the dough equally to make 6 to 7 balls.Roll each one and cut it into cicrcles.Apply the maida paste on the borders.Tale 2 to 3 tsp full of filling.Close the pastry and seal it properly .You may press the edges with the back of a fork.Deep fry it in hot oil until golden in colour.Drain on kitchen towel.
Greet runners and walkers for the 5K and Family Fun Run, Stock forms and pens, answer form questions, and direct applicants to the cashier station. Preparation/training will be made available at a Registration Training session (on race day) with training guidelines sent out previously.
Add the remaining egg mixture in 3 additions, scraping down the bowl after each addition, and beating for 2 minutes afterwards.
I went into my workroom with Jesus, Curly and the Lone Ranger and together we diagnosed what was wrong with the person. I would use my hands, like a human X-ray machine to scan the person while my eyes were closed. I “saw” what was wrong and announced it. “He has a growth on his brain.”
The Search for Santa Paws ... Disney (east) ... 8 PM
It's been a bit of a rubbish half term, with me and the Eldest LB ill with colds again. This has meant cancelling various social engagments which I am not happy about. Not happy at all.
it is known on wet tracks.
She posted on that 'wonderful social networking' site that she had found a fantastic property with loads of potential for cost of ‘next to nothing’.
The photographs, which show now-exposed undercover National Public Order Intelligence Unit police constable Mark Kennedy taking part in a UAF protest against the British National Party in Derbyshire during 2009, have been released by party spokesman Simon Darby.
Level 1: MP Cost: 8, Attacks up to 4 enemies, Damage: 88%, Attacks the enemies 4 times.
So my first book was always big
It’s your job to see Learning in places that you’re not used to seeing learning. I was even able to find it in Ed, Edd & Eddy cartoons…it’s there if you look. It’s everywhere if you look. And once you start seeing it, the world will open up to you and your child.
Oh My!! Where in the world did February go? That is CRAZY!!
Incredible Hulk
Beautiful and artificial
Was it wrong to show women in scanty swimwear, maybe
Nothing is worth it.
happy kids!
EBay is considered today the largest online marketplace where anyone can buy and sell anything they want. The collective impact on ecommerce surprising, in 2011 the overall value of goods on eBay reached over $68.6 million.
Poor financial management is one of the primary reasons for businesses failing. In many instances failure could be avoided if the management applies sound financial principles to all the dealings and decision making. Financial management should not be left totally to the accountants, financial planners or the bankers. The CEO, Managing Director or the entrepreneur need to understand the basic principles of accounting and financial management and apply them when making crucial decisions. This will reflect positively on the organization’s annual profit and loss and balance statements.
ABOUT 6 YEARS AGO...
Retro Causal Plane and Opium Cubism of Imaginative Flight-Depths
GRAND PRIZE
Like the film ties every thing up – there’s no loose ends – I’ll add my point rating of three point five so there’s no loose ends here either. I’ll call it worth seeing but kind of disappointing.
The mandate of the Council of Ministers is as follows:
(on the seafront)
The weekend after the hole being put in my ceiling was Comic Con (there will be a post about the Con next week!) and also the weekend that my toilet stopped working. I woke up that Saturday, peed and when I flushed this loud gurgling sound came from my shower drain. I checked it out and saw nothing, so I went back to bed. I was thinking that I would just go get something to possibly unclog my toilet and/or shower when the toilet upstairs flushed (I can hear the water rushing through the pipes when they flush). Moments later, my shower gurgles again. I look it up on the internet and EVERY SITE tells me that is a “vent pipe” issue. I have no clue what this means really, but I do know it means I can’t fix it myself. So I let my friend-lords know. One of them comes down and tries plunging the toilet (which we already tried, but it never hurts to try again, I guess). I tell him what the internet told me, and he tells me that the very pipe that is the problem in my kitchen ceiling is the vent pipe. They call the plumber and The Gentleman Friend and I go off to the Con.
Acephalix' last full-length, Interminable Night, was my no. 7 album of last year, so I was excited to hear this one.
He appointed judges in the land, in each of the fortified cities of Judah. He told them, “Consider carefully what you do, because you are not judging for man but for the LORD, who is with you whenever you give a verdict. Now let the fear of the LORD be upon you. Judge carefully, for with the LORD our God there is no injustice or partiality or bribery.”
That said - this particular angel is welcome to keep watch over me for as long as it damn well pleases.
Social reproduction
SANTORUM: What Governor Romney just said is that government-run top-down medicine is working pretty well in Massachusetts and he supports it. Now, think about what that means –
Here are a few of my projects:
* International entries are welcome but will be responsible for postage.
As for The Maestro and I? Well, tonight was rehearsal, and this week is the dreaded concert week. No big Valentine's Day celebration for us. I've spent the evening updating my Project 365... oh so very romantic. We'll go on a date next week I guess.
Turnips, one small, remove skins and cut into four
Why am I pulled toward this type of character? I think I have to continually learn the trust lesson. I imagine myself sitting down and discussing life over a cup of Earl Grey tea with a wise woman like Sophie. If I let my imagination go further, I can envision that I might be a woman like Sophie in the future...and maybe a little now. However, at the moment, I'm feeling more like David-cut off and fighting with my own emotional demons- I'm particularly battling with trust issues.
xv) WIPO, as a U.N. specialised agency, shall considerably expand programmes for technical cooperation in IP related matters and qualitatively improve them, as well; bearing in mind the requirements of U.N. operational activities: neutral, impartial and demand-driven;
Dr. Fink, who was greatly admired by Bender, is considered the godfather of electroshock therapy in the United States. In the early 1950s and beyond, Fink was a fully cleared CIA Project Artichoke consultant. In 1951, CIA officials under the direction of Paul Gaynor and Morse Allen of the agency’s Security Research Service (SRS) that oversaw Artichoke, worked closely with Fink in New York City in efforts to thoroughly explore the merits of electroshock techniques for interrogations. The CIA was especially interested in the use of standard electroshock machines in producing amnesia, inducing subjects to talk and making subjects more prone to hypnotic control. According to one CIA document, Fink told officials “an individual could gradually be reduced through the use to electroshock treatment to the vegetable level.”
I quilted in straight lines 1" apart, following the sides of some of the hexies using the same thread as for applique-ing the hexies. I didn't plan on quilting it this way - it evolved as I was doing it (I originally intended on quilting diagonally across the whole quilt). I love how the lines are kind-of-but-not-quite woven through the quilt.
‘You’re staring’, says Libriumia. Ooops. I’ve been doing this a bit lately, my eye’s go blank, and I start staring off into space.
Here’s Kamiya-san, who was forced to stay overnight in a hotel because the show was going on location. They recorded the opening in one of the hotel rooms. And just like that, we departed for Haneda Airport!
20Yes, dear brother, please do me this favor for the Lord’s sake. Give me this encouragement in Christ. 21I am confident as I write this letter that you will do what I ask and even more!
Raising before the sun for her hobbies
I will not discuss each individual aspect of these points of criticism, but feel urged to respond to all of them from a more general perspective. While there is no doubt that the perspectives of right of free speech, freedom of trade, and scope of protection of a trade mark are overriding principles which influence a dispute between a trade mark owner and its competitors, in my opinion, one essential aspect has been omitted from Lord Justice Jacob's considerations: the interest of the trade mark owner. The judgment conveys the impression that the prevailing task of a trade mark is to serve the consumer. This may be the consequence of the use of a trade mark in trade, but it is not the prevailing purpose of a trade mark. The task of a trade mark is to accentuate the producer's goods from the mass of unknown products and to establish a communication channel to actual or potential buyers and users of the product. It is a communication channel for the advantage of its owner, however, with the resulting consequences that the addressed user or buyer may obtain information regarding the product irrespective of whether that information is objective or purely subjective. It is an investment by the trade mark owner which is fundamental to the successful promotion and sale of its goods and/or services.
"Here we did find our first objective. A crypt belonging to a family.
Rachel Dratch has a good reason to be cheesed off at her pal Tina Fey. Dratch left a lengthy stay with Saturday Night Live to star in Fey’s sitcom 30 Rock. She was going to be the original Jenna Maroney, instead she was replaced by the more TV-attractive Jane Krakowski. Dratch’s consolation prize was a multi-character stint on the show that was eventually phased out.
We also have a one-off prototype keg beer called "PyroWeisse" which is a 5% smoked wheat beer. We like the beer although we are fairly sure we can improve on this conceptual idea. Come along tonight and tell us what you think of it, what you like about it, what you don't and what you think it should be.
And it must go.
Awhile back I received an email from a special reader who asked me for my help. Here is a snippet of the email:
“Of the natural predators, leopard seals would be far further south, around the Antarctic continent, at this time,” he says.
- Common Dreams staff
As well as boosting the wealth of a number of Welsh families, experts believe the slave trade was important in the industrial development of Wales. Academics say there are clear links between the Swansea copper industry and slavery because it’s a product that was in demand on the African coast among slave traders.
The ECJ found that, in the absence of evidence to the contrary, testers and other sample products provided to distributors free of charge and marked ‘not for sale’ are not ‘put on the market’ within the meaning of the Trade Marks Directive or Trade Marks Regulation.
You must be an illusion. Can I see through you?
3) A job where I don't have to work on holidays. After working in a hospital for 3 years, this is so nice. At our previous jobs, Shawn and I worked evenings, weekends, holidays, and the occasional 3rd shift. Not fun for this girl who likes her sleep. People don't stop being sick because it's Christmas. But now I have a job that is a little more family (and sleep) friendly. I feel blessed to have this job in a time where jobs can be scarce.
brandy sauce and brandy butter
Hair – E29. 37. 25. 21. 49. Bow & Tights – V17. 15. 09. Eyeshadow – V17. Skin – E04. 02. 00. 000. R20. Converse – 100. W7. V17. 15. 09. Socks – 100. W7. Heart – R59. RV69. Dress – BV29. 25. 31. Ruffle – V01. 04. 00. Collar – V17.
Why Study Reiki with the International House of Reiki?: "Imagine you’re painting an exquisite artwork edged with an ornate gilt frame. This artwork is a painting of you. It’s not you as you generally see or think of yourself. It is you as you would like to imagine yourself.
Does this mean I can O.D. on Nanaimo bars over the upcoming Christmas holidays back home? I mean what is a good Canadian Christmas without the 800 calorie per glass glug of egg nog (Jack in the Box brand), and trough like quantities of shortbreads and homemade balls and bars?
I started helping my mother here after school when I was six years old. I used to watch her, and it wasn't that she was selling books, it was that she was helping people become whoever they were going to turn out to be. When you read a book as a child, it becomes part of your identity in a way that no other reading in your life does.
Favorite actor/actress: That’s a tough one. Megan Fox.
I stand over the stove, as clouds of cream swirl their way through spicy Tazo Chai. Beige, tan, cumulus cloud of cream wends it's way into drink, echoing the spiraling ribbon of thoughts meandering through my just-awake mind.
Yesterday's early morning walk was so much fun that I just couldn't wait to get started on today's stroll!
Level 19: MP Cost: 36, Damage: 394%, Attacks up to 6 enemies.
11 p.m.: ORTM (Malian television) is back on the air, but only playing archive recordings of Malian traditional musicians. If they start playing martial music, or for that matter anything by Banzoumana Sissoko, we’ll know something major is underway. Soon a title appears: “In a moment, a declaration by the soldiers.”
ICC has an observation deck on the 100th floor that is open to the public.
Belly button: In
The first is a detailed research report about his life and works under repressive regimes, list of his published and unpublished books as well as his life as a political activist. The other analysis is by respected scholar Ali Amiri titled “Faiz Muhammad Kateb, the Rationalist Historian“, a scholarly analysis of his work. This one titled “In search of Kateb’s Works” is by Abdullah Shadaan, a former official of the National Archive of Afghanistan. This BBC report titled “3500-pages Works of Kateb Endangered to Extinction” tells the story of how a great part of Kateb’s works could be lost, due to the inattention of the Government and some political discrimination. It also includes concerns of the family members of Kateb about the danger of extinction of 3500-pages of his works.
"Mulder, you're wrong. These are just the acts of kids playing in the snow," she replied. "Haven't you ever made a snow angel?"
I also pulled four old computers out of that room (the big ole tower kind) to recycle, and a box of old notebooks from college to recycle as well.
½ tsp dried thyme
By five, it was safe - more or less - to open her eyes. Air swiped the moisture from them instantly, left her blinking, but she picked out the Wildhawk more quickly this time. They hurtled upward, Jashi's Warding racing ahead. This time as they approached the peak of their arc, almost four times as high as their first attempt, Pevan saw the Wilder's scintillant wing twist as the Warding washed over it.
E. Essential start to your day: breakfast!
The lists are also larded with defunct publishers--including the notorious Aspen Mountain Press--and moribund agencies--including dead fee-chargers, such as A Picture of You and Authentic Creations. Amateur agencies get space as well (B.R. Fleury, Barron's Literary Management, Chamein Canton Agency). And though many reputable companies are included alongside the duds, there is nothing you can learn from these listings. Other than the company's name, no details are provided--no address, no website link, no submission guidelines, no nothing--and the little popup window that supposedly shows the company's "editorial line" appears to be exactly the same for every single company, making it not just useless but actively misleading.
I should have taken some garden pics, but that wasn't why I went to the garden so all I had was my phone. Everything is growing wonderfully with our blessed rain. We received about 3.5 inches since Monday. I am very thankful!
Grand Teton Brewing Co. Bitch Creek ESB
First, I would ask if you can guess by a couple of these pictures, where the field trip was? I will post more pictures later that will reveal where this is but just found the beauty a bit ironic.
2010.09.01 Israel Samaria 0 2 A rabbi and his wife are shot by Palestinian terrorists while riding in their car.
The one that says “Follow Amber to India in your email inbox! :)”? CLICK THAT BUTTON THAT SAYS FOLLOW AMBER TO INDIA! :) Please? Basically, that just means that you will put your e-mail address in and everytime I post a blog you will get it in an e-mail! This is the perfect way to make sure that you get each week’s prayer requests, as well as not missing anything I post while I am in India! Don’t worry, I won’t spam you. :)
I added seed beads and Tiger eye chips to the jewelry fundamental and added it to the bottom of the ball using hot glue. Lastly, I added a jump ring to a 1/8" punched hole in my image and added it to the kissing ball. Now I am all ready to be KISSED! ;)
It is this series of surprises that makes our fortuitous trip to Boljoon a happy accident. The view from the bend in Ili Rock, the rain that sets an impromptu parley with Lindzey, the stroll that leads us to a spring – all these surprising turns of events (bulho, if you will) make for a wonderful afternoon in Boljoon.
White paper or labels
1:3 (page 5): Key Points:
Hat and boots walk me deep
According to Run the Planet a 190 lb man would burn 2,171 calories running 17.5 miles. In researching calories in a lunch Denise helped me find this for Ruth's Chris on the Live Strong website "The signature petite filet contains 340.... The creamed spinach side, for example, contains 294 calories per 317 g serving and the crème brulee dessert contains 680 calories per dish." Add 2 beers at 150 calories each and that lunch is over 1,600 calories. However, nobody gets the petite filet at Peter Lugers and 1,600 doest even count the fries.
So often in my life I admit I have been the one standing, clinging to my bag. And, if I’m honest- it felt good to have ‘something I can cling to.' It felt good to fool myself into somehow thinking that I was safe if I did so. But that my friend is such a lie. It’s not who gets to the end with the most prizes- it’s who gets to the end and hears the words ‘well done, my good and faithful servant.
As all Cat Fans know, Selina made her debut way back in Batman #1 as an uncostumed jewel thief known as The Cat. She was modeled after sex-goddess of the day, Hedy Lamarr, looked smashing in an evening gown, and the first thing Batman noticed was her very shapely legs. Her first “costume”consisted only of a full face furry cat-mask, which wasn’t exactly flattering.
Finally I decided I had to go see him. Perhaps there would be a reason we weren't right for each other. He'd be too grouchy or ugly or mean. He'd make it plain that he didn't want to live with me. It would be obvious that he would never fit into our furry little family. If we didn't like each other, then I would wish him the best and stop thinking about him.
Some of the offence can only be described as faux. A recent report* from the Department of Health authored by Professor Hilary Graham has criticised anti-smoker organisations - by implication, Action on Smoking and Health (ASH) - for turning smokers into lepers, stigmatising them and making them into a despised underclass. Quite rightly this situation would never be allowed to happen to ethnic minorities and gay people.
So Kill It. As Well as the Police.
Yes, there does need to be a "re-start" button, but I'm not referring to the health care debate. The best scenario would be to explode both parties, but that obviously isn't going to happen. So the next thing to do is to start eliminating incumbents until we have a plurality that understands a few things:
Lindsay Lohan is disappointed that Rosie O’Donnell picked on her saying she always thought she and Rosie had a good relationship. Just because they guy you were with last night called you ‘cookie’, doesn’t mean you are one, Lindsay.
Incoming!
of the copics I'd used also but its gone AWOL (told you it wouldn't last long lol) Mind you I'm surprised I found this post to put up.My brain has been extra woolly to normal this last week So glad its coming to half term and I can have a few days break (Not loads though as its wedding stationary to prepare) while I'm on hols so its busy, busy, busy,
200 g corinths
I realize that I am talking in circles, so I will just come out and say it. A new friend just told me she ran into a relative, who told her she could tell lots of stories about my husband and me, etc… Really? I am 55 years old. My husband is less than three months from his 56th birthday. If someone needs to bring up things from the past to make us look bad and themselves look good, I am wondering who has the problem.
About a week and a half ago, we traveled about an hour south to Victoria, TX. We wanted to go down there to hit a store that we don't have here and since it was coming up on time to eat dinner, we decided to eat while we were there. As usual, I took Sophie some food in a lunch box in case I needed to feed her something I knew was safe. I wanted to eat somewhere I could order her something, but I wanted her safe food in case I chickened out.
- The recipe calls for chopped nuts and raisins. I was baking this cake for my book group and there are some raisin-haters and nut-shunners among the members. I omitted the raisins and figured that I could get away with very finely chopped pecans (the least offensive nut to my tasters). Trader Joe's sells bags of toasted, chopped (finely) pecans that are an absolute lifesaver for a busy baker.
The Great Recession has hit younger workers particularly hard. The unemployment rate for those ages 16 to 24 stands at 16%, while it’s just 7.4% for those age 25 to 54.
God: “I am giving you life.” “You need Me.”
Some of the fear was released when the lady on the phone basically called me a heffer.
That is it for this very quick fly-by post.... see you all again soon when I will hopefully have a finished Rose Garden to show you!
If you have the opportunity to try out a Vagabond, give it a shot. I am betting you will love it as much as I! I have literally cut thousands of die cuts this past month and it hasn't slowed time even a little!
Get back i the presence and light of God right after you sin and let the Blood do the job that it was entended to do. Don’t get comfortable in your sin, Get Up!!! It’s not about you. Jesus paid an expensive price so that you could be cleansed. That Blood should not be a waste to where you life is concerned. Get Up!!! Quit thinking you have to qualify, the Blood is what qualifies you. Don’t let this world tell you that you have to do it for yourself. They say, “God helps those who helps themselves”, that’s nothing but a lie from the pits of hell. God helped you BEFORE you could help yourself now Get Up!!!
And you don't wanna gain a pound.
Off I went, and I was going crazy trying to figure out what I was going to do. I finally got the idea to buy some sugar babies, a onesie, a baby bedtime book, and a t-shirt for myself to take weekly pictures in. I put it all in a blue bag with pink tissue paper!
More Provence yummies coming up, too.
We had so much fun in downtown Salt Lake at Abravanel Hall and at the Trax station on South Temple right in front of Abravanel. There was even a random hot dog stand! GENIUS! My little Bridger was being my little art director, telling us where to take pictures next. Sneaky little kid even got Jill's hot dog out of it. LOL! And a Jolly Rancher . . . man that kid knows how to work it! ;)
Then some years later I read, to my horror, that in 1874 the Vienna city council had opened a new municipal cemetery two or three miles out of town, the Zentral Friedhof, where the great and good, present and past, as well as the humble of Vienna would henceforth be buried. To this end they dug up Beethoven and Schubert from their little private graveyard and transferred what remained of their remains to new resting places with their fellow musicians. The quiet graves beside which I had paid homage had been empty. Schubert's lyre hardly respected the truth, and Beethoven's butterfly had flown.
Miles Davis was an innovative composer and bandleader and is regarded as one of the most influential and respected figures in 20th century jazz. Along with his musical groups, Davis was at the forefront of major developments in the genre like bebop, cool jazz, hard bop, modal jazz and jazz fusion from the late 1940s to the early 1960s. His album “Kind of Blue” is the best-selling album in the history of jazz music and his work garnered him eight Grammy Awards, a Grammy Lifetime Achievement Award and three Grammy Hall of Fame Awards.
After Caden came home from the hospital with a feeding tube, we had to use a stethoscope to "check placement" of the tube, to make sure it was in the stomach before putting medications and food through it. After noticing (from a blog post of course) that we were using the fantabulous yellow plastic stethoscope they gave us at the hospital, a sweet nurse friend of ours offered to let us use her own stethoscope. Caden, praise the Lord, doesn't have his feeding tube any more; but sometimes I still like to use the stethoscope just to listen to his heart.
I know you only wanted a query and ten pages, but I am so confident you’ll like my work that I scent the hole book. I am offering this as an exclusive transmission for one week, but after that I’ll really need to move on if I haven’t herd from you. I want to enjoy my millionaire status before the world ends or before the next election - whichever comes first. Who knows what the tax rate will be after that!
While we usually link the word vulgar to the first description, the second one is still used in some contexts, despite the label dated in the dictionary.
I love the French Revolution. Not all the death and destruction, of course, but when I think fondly upon my French heritage, it inevitably comes up. (For my brother, it’s Napoleon.) The world of Mélusine, or, at least, the city itself, is patterned after it. There’s even the Sanguette rather than the guillotine, which I smiled over. Interesting new settings in fantasy are always a plus with me, even if they’re still European-based. The other cultures Monette present are interesting, especially the last one we meet and end the novel in. However, the learning curve can be a little steep—Monette throws in a complex calendar system that I still don’t quite understand, even with this handy chart from her website. To be fair, that reflects reality in the French Revolution, but it extends to the magic system. There’s a fine line to walk between making a world feel lived in and going a little too far, and I think Monette errs a little. But only a little. It’s a mostly comfortable setting with some trouble spots.
Marny here...Lovely adventures just keep coming our way. We are so fortunate. This is a story in which two special people will be introduced. And if you read all the way to the end, we want to share about a special tutorial coming this way!
I want to Thank Colin from http://crimsoncricut.blogspot.com/ for choosing my Blog for the Liebster Award. I feel so Honored! Colin has a Great Blog and is So Talented. I think I was his first Follower. Please take a few minutes and check out his Blog.
Here you have your Inner and Outer Skirts sewn to one another.
Denver, CO (PRWEB) April 30, 2012 During the month of May, Whole Foods Market and Forkly are joining wine aficionados across the US to celebrate Languedoc Day (May 3) and Chardonnay Day (May 24). The two companies are encouraging their customers and users to participate in the virtual celebrations with a giveaway of over fifteen Whole Foods gift certificates–and an even bigger gift to Forkly users (blog.forkly.com and 21+ only) who post and rate Languedoc wine on May 3 and Chardonnay wine on May 24.
Attack of the ToybotsNicktoons: Advance Of The Toybots
Fast-forward to autumn, 2008. James, my husband, and I were attending a creativity retreat in Massachusetts hosted by our friend Jill Badonsky. It was here that I saw my first SoulCollage® card. Jill had asked the participants to bring a creative project to share with the group. I brought my art journals, James had his leatherwork, and as we went around the room sharing our respective creative endeavors, Michele Audet pulled out a box with her beautiful SoulCollage® cards. I was transfixed. I’d never seen anything like it, and I knew that this powerful form of self-expression was for me! I spent much of that weekend looking through Michele's deck, and the first thing I did when we returned home was to begin making my own cards.
I really don’t think I have ever quit anything. I mean, I quit a few jobs when I was younger but felt terrible about it. I have never given up on a project, a hobby, a round of golf, a run or a workout.
“Writing a book is a demanding and emotional experience but save some vitality and creativity for the next big exciting step - getting it published.”
One of my favorite things... Time to stitch and how I have missed this over recent weeks. I have not had much spare time at all to work on my projects consistently.
Anyhow in a weeks time I will find myself standing in front of a crowd of 'Catholic Educational Professionals' who, in their brief to me, have described themselves at 10% Catholic 20% other Christian and 70% Agnostic or Atheist. Do I need to repeat the phrase 'Catholic Professional Christians' again or have you got my drift? Well having got over statistical shock I decided there just might be an opportunity for evangelism here and like St Paul I better start with looking for some common ground. Some sort of altar to the unknown God that I could claim as my own and somehow get a leg in to the rarified alternative reality that is professional agnosticism. 'Aha', says I when I found the mission statement of these 'Catholic Professional Christians' tucked away towards the end of the brief. Alas not a word in it says anything really Christian, professional or Catholic.
Only issue is that it's too big for my MotherEase Pail... it bunched and the lid doesn't snap down properly because of all the bulk. Can't have them all!
I prefer names to be somewhat evocative, but more enigmatic than emblematic. One of my favorites is Orwell's "Winston Smith," a pedestrian surname preceded by a Christian name with aspirations. It's a name you can spend some time considering, but also a name you can skate right across without a second glance. If you want to read something into it, you can, but it doesn't demand anything from the reader.
It’s funny how old men flirt with young women. My grandpa does it and so did this Italian charm salesman. He took a hold of my hand and asked if I was married with a twinkle in his eye. I wasn’t wearing my promise ring, so I guess it was a valid question! When I answered I would be soon, he pulled me closer and said, “Tell him he’s a very lucky man.” Ha! So Italian and so adorable.
On top of that, we sponsor tons of races through the year, ladder events, qualifiers for several classes, Pan Am trials, etc. Plus, our sailors participate actively in all the local West Coast PHRF big boat circuit.
Cassandra came to find a curious duo awaiting her, a dapper sell-sword with a handlebar mustache who introduced himself as Jory Menadue and a sizable but predominantly silent man with a pair of mailed fists branded upon his cheeks–introduced by jory as Daveth. It was revealed that the duo had traveled for several months from Katapesh at the behest of Cassandra’s parents–both to oversee their daughter’s continued safety as well as to deliver a vast train of gifts and accouterments to make her accommodations more comfortable.
I see myself as a sadist
"Great careers are for people who are lucky, special, geniuses...
Slowly David started realizing the truth and slowly the love he felt (if it ever was true love?) turned into feelings of hostility. Anger. He became angry at Cassandra for pretending to love him. He became angry at himself for falling for the lie.
Next, there is also activity that transpires that is of a sexual or lovemaking action. There is no action that a human being can engage in that is more “God like” than the act of creating a new life. Although each time there is a sexual act, the creation of a new child does not occur, it is still the act that is symbolic of creation, and it puts you in the position of being better able to understand what it means to use your “Godness and Goddessness,” if you will, and to create life, within you. By doing this the charkas generate an abundance of creative energy which can in turn be used for any purpose that one sees fit. It can be utilized to work with art, with creating music, or some other creative activity. It is very important to realize that creative energy is the most powerful human energy that exists, meaning that it is truly an energy that is cosmic in its nature. Every atom that exists, and every particle that makes up the atoms, has within it an innate “knowing” of how to create, of the need to create, for creation is the generating of energy and this energy is the force that drives one’s life on all levels. And so, your body, mind, and consciousness, thus your psyche, is generating creative power at all times. If you do not have an outlet or purpose for using that energy, then it will begin to build up within the various energy centers and eventually will reach a point where the body can generate no more. There is no room for it or the body has nowhere to store that energy and thus causes the energy generated within to cease. That energy that has built up will eventually dissipate. Thus, having a creative outlet is so very important for the purpose of utilizing your creative power in a constructive manner. There is a thin line between constructive energy and destructive energy. Actually, there is no difference in the energies, but there is difference in the intent for which the energy is used. Intent motivates. If your intent is positive, then the use of the energy will be positive and constructive. But if your intent is negative, which means totally self-serving, then the energy will be used destructively. This happens often when a person is angry and spits out their venom that directs what would have been constructive energy in a destructive manner. Energy never misses it target. If you think ill of another person, then that person will receive those thoughts in a very subtle, often unconscious way. In fact, we would say that they rarely manifest on the conscious level of the one receiving the thought. Rather, they influence or manifest on the unconscious level. Things can happen as a result. The person can feel depressed, or a sense of despair or, in severe cases, a sense of hopelessness and even self-destruction. And so it is so very important to know that thoughts carry a great deal of power, and the greatest of these powers is creative power.
*Let's avoid the obvious quip: "so he'll have some place to store his keys." Thanks.
And some of us probably think that we don't really ever do any of those things. We might think that the calling to help other people is reserved to people with hearts larger than ours, to people with a capacity for patience and love far beyond what we feel capable of giving. We may feel powerless to really impact the world in any way, that we simply need to focus on ourselves and our families and trust that we'll make it through with our spirits relatively intact. We may feel to afraid, too weak, too insignificant, too useless to make a difference.
I do love those Clearly Inspired Challenges .... don't you?? I mean, great inspiration AND the chance to win?? :) Awesome. Love it.
Passing an enormous beech, its twisting entwined branches like Medusa’s hair, we pause to take on water and take in the solitude – away from the car parks, the Common is delightfully peaceful.
Father, thank you for the cup of my life.
Despite that Yunho hyung had just finished his Tokyo Dome concert, he called us after our first broadcast on SBS’s ‘Inkigayo’. He monitored each one of us and we listened to his advice with the cell phone on speaker mode. For now, we need advice on our stage performance rather than for variety programs.
Now..on to Bennett. Here's a few ideas for him.
The news this week that Chinese Family Planning officials had raided a small farming community in rural Hunan Province and confiscated nearly twenty young children has citizens in China understandably outraged (a Baidu search this morning shows over 600 independent postings in various newspapers, websites, and other media). While this news is familiar to attentive people in the West (we publicized it in October 2006, and it was later investigated by Dutch Television and the L.A. Times), aside from a small legal notice published in China, the case was unknown.
"Looking at events through their eyes, without the benefit of modern science, I attempted to appreciate as much as possible their perspective.
Still a few other projects yet to be started and requiring a quick finish.
Network.
Make sure you butter is soft, if not blast it in the microwave for a few seconds. Add to the flour along with the egg and 1 tablespoon of water. Beat with a spoon or spatula to form a dough. (Yes I know this goes against all traditional pastry making!)
Many fathers and sons have their issues. That’s not new. But normal conflicts are exacerbated by the father participating in the planning of the Vietnam War with the son participating in the protests. Throw in an Irish Catholic family and you’ve got real potential for a jarring conflict.
yeah but what you did was just…plain rude.
And mod, if you're reading this, I was warming up to you! LOL... and I think you're smart for leaving! I shall be joining you on the other side once I clear my name :)
Dom's friend and occasional co-author, Marcus Borg, led a day-long seminar that I attended on his book The Heart of Christianity. I got my email moniker from that book: Emerging Paradigm.
I get to see Jane and Samantha, who are pictured together, and Josie more often than the others because they live nearby.
Dream job still waiting to be found.
in other reality ..
“After publication, details and review copies are sent to the local and national media and to specialist magazines and journals.”
I LOVE B&BW hand soaps. I know, hand soap is hand soap, but these smell so good. After trying one I was hooked and have stuck with it since. I buy 6 or 7 at a time (whatever the deal is) and always try the new scents. My current scent is the fresh picked cherries... amazing. I will continue to buy these as long as they make them.
Memories made, and saved until next year,
Narrative of the former boss of the company that controls gas about the terrible explosion on the pipeline near Voroshilovgrad. The explosion occurred beside a railway track, as a result of the action of high temperatures the rails changed from a solid state to a liquid one, and just then a train came along, the driver managed to brake, and if he had not managed then people would have perished, but fortunately nobody perished because the driver managed to brake and if he hadn’t managed to break then people would certainly have perished, and not just people, but children, the train was full of children who they were taking from the south to somewhere in the north, the children had been on a holiday in the south and they were going to their permanent location, and then there was such a terrible accident, a good thing that no-one was hurt, that the driver managed to brake.
03. The Last Year
The topic of hydraulic fracturing is also being debated in Ireland at the moment. The Irish Government is currently deciding whether or not to allow drilling for natural gas to take place here, but is going to put off their decision until further study has been done. Based on the case study of America the most sensible and morally backed decision would be not to go ahead with the drilling.
A passage in Edward Gibbon’s masterpiece The Decline and Fall of Rome is prophetic. He pondered what would have befallen us had Muslims won the battle of Poitiers in France in 733. He saw that battle as a major turning point in European history:-
There's so much going on in this picture - the children's dilemma, the fabric of the woman's dress, the incidental action outside of the rectangle of the phone booth and the strange way it breaks up the picture, the intersecting lines of color, the abstract texture of the sidewalk, and of course above all the humor of the situation. Now that's a picture!
CHERNOBYL DIARIES Tv spot 2: Six tourists hire an extreme tour guide who takes them to the abandoned city Pripyat, the former home to the workers of the Chernobyl nuclear reactor. During their exploration, they soon discover they are not alone.
Employment & Earning of Food Science Technicians
"The stands will be slightly less studded with red, yellow, and green at the Ghana-Uruguay World Cup game today in Johannesburg. One thousand Ghanaian football fans, bankrolled by their government to cheer on the Black Stars, have been sent home due to lack of funding."
In my name shall they cast out devils;
I decided to brew a "Harvest India Pale Ale," using my crop of this year's hops from my back yard. Last year, I had enough hops for three 10-gallon batches of hoppy brew. This year, my hop crop sucked, because of the extreme heat and humidity, (but with little rain). Oh well, I still had enough hop flowers for a "brutal" addition to this IPA, which is a borderline Imperial IPA with a 1.072 starting gravity. (Imperials start at 1.075). I could have had a higher starting gravity, but I sparged more wort out of the mash tun's grain bed to try to get a higher pre-boil volume close to 14 (or so) gallons. All of the hop flowers suck-up a lot of water, and also the long boil time will evaporate-off a lot of H2O. I succeeded; the total wort volume was about 11-1/2 gallons post-boil, which will come out to be about 10 gallons final volume for the kegs, after time spent in primary fermentation, secondary fermentation, and conditioning.
I went to the supermarket the other day to buy some tea and a few other things. While walking along the shelves I had one of those moments of “heightened awareness.” Sounds all rather mystical and other-worldly, but I’m sure you know what I mean. It’s when you suddenly come out of auto-pilot mode and just see things differently.
ME: OK, but you have to admit that was funny, right?
As a teacher and researcher, much of my work is concerned with organized or critical thinking–what is the issue of concern, where does this sit within some broader domain, what is the logical structure of an argument, what are critical uncertainties, how do we solve a problem.
I thought about knocking over banks and convenience stores to help with finances, but those pesky cops kept showing up and ruining my plans. So, I dropped that idea and began looking into identity theft…
Independently, of course.
1tsp garam masala
Yard Sale Finds
Mom has a pretty unique situation, so it was hard to find a program that would work with her. First, she has two different disabilities that she needs a service dog's help with and only 5% of all service dog programs in the United States will train a dog for multiple disabilities.
you are right on track. If you just happened upon the hop and want to start from the beginning, or if there is a glitch somewhere along the way, you can go to the bottom of this post for the master hop list.
There are three options that I think are viable to defining these folks.
Aside from that, the embroidery party over the weekend went off without a hitch! Little did I know that it was the educator's first party. We had so much fun and I made some new embroidery friends, whom I'm sure you'll read about in the future! It was nice to "teach", but in a different setting.
I wonder if there’s a connection between bulimia and suppressed misery? I never cry when I need to. Since my grandmother died, I haven’t let myself. I got so used to not crying because I thought that if I started I wouldn’t be able to stop, that now I don’t cry over anything. There’s a lot of anger mixed up in that too – think a big family fight over my dad not getting any say in his mother’s funeral – and that’s always a big trigger for my eating disorder.
Choosing the right floors for your home can be and exciting yet complicated process. See how to best evaluate your options depending on room type.
But I have made it to work today, I am the only one in the building as its very cold. The schools are open if you can get your kids there by yourself as there is no school transport running, I dropped mine off on the way to the HOS but may well lock up early to collect them on the way home.
And finally - demonstrating the truth that with great manners comes great responsibility - last week when I asked Amari if I could change her diapers she gave me her first, "No thanks," and walked away."
This film was the first feature film voice role for Betty Rubble's voice actress Gerry Johnson. Additionally, it marked the first voice work of Henry Corden, who supplied Fred's singing voice, and would go on to fully assume the role of Fred after Alan Reed's death in 1977.
Speaking of the all powerful and wonderful Pinterest... this recipe was one that I pinned on my board of recipes to try. I may be completely, absurdly obsessed with lemon and almost always check out all of the recipes with lemon in them.
Your GSM cell phone number with you before, carrying your US number on roaming. But the map parma italy from your hotel room is another expensive way to be completely discovered. It is a commonly discussed subject among the most artistically rich countries in the map parma italy like to know about the map parma italy be conveyed to the country's geological peculiarities and the map parma italy is one of those quaint little peaceful villages in surroundings that brings in tranquility and a sense of its timeless appeal.
Then I got moody again and started to go and he whapped me a couple more times and I tried again.
“Hey Glenn, you gonna score a goal for me today?”
68. I thought I’d come over and say hello before you caught me staring.
Westerns are usually seen as an American art form, but there’s something universal about them – the good guys against the good guys, pioneers trying to conquer new frontiers and tame new lands, the art of surviving on your wits and your bravery. Whatever. Or maybe it’s just that, as someone who loves action movies, I know I will get my payback with the obligatory big showdown at the end of a Western.
I hope you like because I'm having fun. More to come :)
muffin.
If your man likes the lime li
* Ice Club Demorra-Short Track Speed Skating Exhibition
So...without further ado...I would like to introduce you to my Nancy...she's lovely, isn't she? Love you! Love, me. Bubbs...
30. Whiskey Bent and Hell Bound -- Hank Williams Jr.
The humble love triangle. It seems that you can’t turn around without seeing a movie poster or a book cover with three people pouting prettily on the cover.
I can hear some of you shouting:
Please check Iamroses for these amazing flowers, below you will find the links:
What are the pros and cons of unions? Overall, do you think that unions improve working conditions for employees or do you feel that unions are a waste of employee salaries? (Feel free to use the Air Canada situation as an example)
A: I can’t answer this question because I allready have enough issues with lawyers because I am outspoken. All My best friends and family members know WHO his is. I call him “The Parassite”. It’s best to share Alessandro Gassman than to speak about garbage.
the ground on a flatulence-resonance field). He motions for the
This is what the Church in every age is here to teach us: a well-thought-out approach to life. Jesus Christ is unchanging; so is his bride the Church whether She clashes with the whims of culture or not. We see a very clear example of this in Pope Paul VI's encyclical letter Humanae Vitae. While many people don't like what the Church teaches with regards to human sexuality, marriage, contraception and abortion, Her teachings will not be altered. Truth is not subject to an opinion poll.
Holden waited for Olivia with the hope he would see her one more time.
The first day basically involved me being very extreme when I or my roommates used any amount of water at any given moment (I’m sure I drove them crazyJ). I started out by participating in the old-fashioned art of hand washing my clothes and letting them hang dry. That wasn’t too hard and made me feel like I was already making a huge difference. This act was then followed by taking a bath instead of a shower and hand washing dishes in a sink filled with soapy water. As I said, I was very good about doing these tasks in the first couple of days. But then again, that was the weekend.
“Holding a prism up to a bright window demonstrates a basic principle of optics that the plain white light radiating from our sun is actually made up of a rainbow of colors. Through air, these colors of light all travel in about the same way, but in water, different colors travel differently. Water…”
Rehearse this and re-rehearse it as often as you can. Practice and never give up because practicing gratitude and self-care is a gift to self and a gift to others. And when you practice that kind of goodness, it makes you well physically, emotionally and spiritually.
So, thanks for stopping by. If you want, add me to your google reader. The RSS link is on the sidebar to your right.
Rape Me – Nirvana
The Best Mobility Scooter on the Market
MERRY CHRISTMAS AND HAPPY HOLIDAYS from the "Crow" girls....Peg, Shelly and Evie.
There are those optimists who say “No, we have such a strong economy, such sophisticated infrastructure, such a talent pool, that we can never sink”.
A similar order last July galvanised a larger turnout in the capital city, with organisers saying nearly 50,000 gathered to walk past roadblocks and policemen who shut down the city. But police said only 6,000 took part in the rally and nearly 1,700 were arrested.
At Apple Inc. the campus is very secure so it's not like you can just wander around and peek in on engineers to see what they're up to. But there are several things you can do to soak in the the vibe of appleness emitted from Infinite Loop. One is to take your picture in front of 1 Infinite Loop. If you look closely you can see the green number 1 at the end of the driveway onto the main campus.
Another bright blue day out there today, that’s supposed to last until tomorrow, then the rain is predicted to be heavy over the weekend. It got cold overnight, there was already frost on my vehicle at 1 A.M. when I finished work last night. What that means for round two of the flowering trees that were just about to bloom remains to be seen, I will check on that today, along with the lilacs that were just beginning to bloom. It’s been so nice to smell real lilacs rather than the heavy artificial lilac scents that manufacturers add to products, nothing like the real thing!
Meanwhile, Finch poses as a doctor to meet this week’s POI, a baby girl named Leila. Leila probably has the saddest back story of any POI to date – she was abandoned outside St. Raymond’s Hospital and has some illnesses that are preventing her from getting adopted. But she’s SUPER cute – so why would anyone want to abandon or harm her?
It should be noted on our part that our goal is not to half-ass the program today. From the time you hike your heavy black KB to the moment you make the final turn from the last sprint…All out 100% Effort!!! Tomorrow is a rest day, so…Four, Six or Eight times through would be nice, so we were told. And for those of you doing the math at home…Yeah 8x400m is a two-mile sprint!?!
I'd decide on matching clothes.
And when we weep - fallen is the expectations we have of each other
I’m still here. Still lurking all of your blogs. No worries. Raising this baby. He’s 4 months old already! He’s been cranky/fussy more so than usual lately. Keep calling the doctor, being the 1st time mom that I am, and she says that is sounds like teething. But no teeth yet. And, from what I hear it can take months for those teeth to show. I hope he’s not fussy for months. He’s such a good baby otherwise. As evidenced by the following photos:
By Tom Hopkins for Producers eSource
For the purposes on this blog, however, I was drawn into the tales of two New York politicians who became victims of rumor-mongering that summer. Powerful New York senator Roscoe Conkling was seen as a political rival of Garfield's, a thorn in the president's side, especially considering Conkling's own political protege -- his pawn, really -- was Garfield's vice president, Chester A. Arthur. Traumatic crises in this country are frequently accompanied by a churning undercurrent of suspicion and conspiracy, and Conkling and Arthur became victims of just such a shadowy accusation that summer.
So here is to hoping tomorrow brings us better heath, and no need for more emergency visits!!
RIP, Layne Staley. RIP, Alice in Chains. And Happy Anniversary, Sweetie.
I would have Philip Ardagh, just because I’d like to see how he and Samuel Clemens (another great humourist) get along.
Jorrie wanted a way to take down the Migs that were giving us so much grief, but he wanted to do it in a way that would make it look like pilot error and keep the Russians and Cubans guessing. The best technological ‘fit’ I could work out at the time was an accelerated laser weapon with a nuclear source. We could constrain a highly energized particle stream inside a “tube” or “ring” laser, bring its energy level up to a few trillion volts and send it into a Mig. It would be like a focused EMP Cannon with a 1/4 wave frequency anywhere from hundreds of yards to thousands of miles in length. The result of a hit on a plane (and the pilot it contained), would be catastrophic, but almost undetectable unless one found the energy transfer point.
“Well, the truth of it is this, dear heart. If you look up, tell me what is the first thing you see?” the man’s daughter looked up into the vault of heaven and all around as far as her head and eyes would allow and shouted: “Stars!”
When I think back and read this blog from two years ago I'm astounded at how far we've really come. I cannot believe I agreed to move to London after JUST having a baby. X was only 11 weeks old when we boarded the plane. What was I thinking? And then we moved into that flat, which I was so unhappy with from day one. It was so full of troubles. It was truly a blessing in disguise that we moved.
Oh, and she has figured out how to remove her diaper.
This is the latest beer we’ve every done here and are doing so to give everyone a little taste of how things changed. From all the big nasty hoppy K’s, to the light and fruit AK’s up to the proper IPAs of moderate strength and hop we get this baby. Its wet. Its beer! It’s from the mid-80’s. You lot might have actually had this beer when it was on tap, but it wasn’t called an IPA…not by their marketing, just in the logs. Notes for the recipe? Its basically a blend of many English malts, a touch of American malt and a flys fart of invert syrup. Then we gotta color this baby up with some caramel. The hops were exceedingly old, on average about 3 years old and they were added near the beginning so all you’d get was a bit of bitterness. Very moderate if that word has ever been used before. The best thing about this beer is you can literally drink vast amounts of it without having to worry about cost for a lot of flavor getting in the way. You want a proper pissup pint to drink alongside some whisk(e)y, here you go!
We just noticed that Antin has the Today’s Top Value on ShopNBC, a “spinning brush and blow dryer all in one.” It’s from Conair.
His boss, Michael Ignatieff, wants to recall the parliamentary defence committee this summer to debate this matter – especially the deal’s secretive manner.
LaShawn – When I think of Kirani I think of young and hungry. He just seems to want it really bad.
Products Used:
I would like to hide something in the garbage can that would literally scare the crap right out of the next dog that attempted theft. Something spring-loaded, so that when that lid was moved…. Although, I think I would be the first to get it right in the keester. I would forget and open it. I know I would. Got to put the mind in gear to come up with something to deter them. I will market it with my crapapult and make millions.
Located so close to St Pauls and rich in original features you would expect it to be bustling but rarely is. Perhaps in part due to Ye Olde Cheshire Cheese (close to Dr Johnson's House) being a little further up Fleet Street or that tucked in an alleyway people simply detour to pubs on the main thoroughfare.
What it really
Keith is a somewhat silent man, and Marnie mistook that for strength. They met when they were young and he was frisky; she didn’t notice in all the excitement that he was boring. After they settled down Keith did what he always did with his dullness; he hid it in quiet service. He made himself useful by fetching and repairing things, industry that familiarized him with all the consumables that now inhabit his weekends. He didn’t reveal himself.
Brilliant.
As a result of the inoperable washer, we took our laundry to the laundromat today. Notice that I said "we". It was amazing. Six washers, six dryers, four children, two parents. Six laundry baskets. All the laundry washed, dried, folded and put away in just two hours. It was family time. Everyone pitched in. I didn't spend hours doing laundry by myself. I didn't feel isolated or irritated. I've never had so much help with laundry. Why do I need a washing machine again?
What is something you have never done that you would love to do or learn?
"Whatever, Mom," I said. "I'm going to bed."
In my perfect world, though, anyone and everyone would be appalled at the idea of just anyone hopping on the internet, taking a taste, and, BAM!, getting some certificate from an official-sounding organization proclaiming that anyone is an expert in some field of forensic sciences. Just like that.
outfit pics courtesy of instagram:
To be honest, I think the wheel needs some screws tightening (don't we all) and I need to make consistent effort in making time to practice. But the other day I got a bit fed up with it all going more wrong than right (I really think I'm going to be one of those people unable to DO spinning, if indeed such people exist. Which they do now) so reverted to old faithful... my drop spindle.
Then finally he asked me, "What can I do to change your mind?"
I had a gorgeous smelling soap, an embroidered handkerchief, yummy choccy that has now all been scoffed!, a pretty emery board, two wonderful handmade fabric strawberries (shown at top of the post in their current home), a butterfly brooch, some mini pegs, buttons in a sweet little jar, delicious strawberry fabric and a cupcake lipbalm.
I first want to thank Dawn Olchefske of DO Stamping for sharing the video that taught me how to do this. She has some really wonderful videos and highly recommend her You Tube Channel if your looking for fun card and gift ideas.
We have established from official Bursa Malaysia announcements and WTK’s Annual Report (below) that just a few months after acquiring the plantation for RM3.7million Daud sold 80% of it to WTK/Biofresh for RM23.4million.
I served these with Meat Loaf. My husband was very happy-- he loves vegetables. We both felt that these were cooked, just right. Not mushy... slightly crunchy in the center. Sweet. Yum!! I love cooked carrots, this way.
Do you? Do you know what it is that I am currently speaking of? “Ya know what I’m sayin’?” Now, in and of itself, it’s harmless. Quite a few people say it every once and awhile. No, no, not this guy. It might as well have been a form of punctuation to this cock for brains. Like a comma. Repeating, over and over, as if he himself was curious what he was saying.
I’m right here
THAT was the moment the war was lost.
Eggs and bacon
to learn to stop resisting,
I'm thinking of people who give up their lives in order to take care of aging parents, who don't deserve to die alone in enormously expensive warehouses for the elderly or infirmed. "Important" people have the luxury to forget their parents...and give them the "best institutions" money can buy!
45. War And Peace - Leo Tolstoy
So you will see a new Blinkie added to my page and I want you all to mark this date because this is one event that you are not going to want to miss HE! HE! I know I can't wait for it :) So lets get on with my creation to share with you all today, I must say that with the passing of my friend this week it has given me a reality check with how much I really keep in touch with them all, so I have been making cards to send out to friends and family that I don't get to see or talk with much anymore.
9. dependency on the state or state benefits
Me: Write and publish books and collaborate with a French university developing video online courses.
There are many sites online that can help you and guide you when you want to consider getting a nursing degree in just 12 months. I have tried the acceleratednursingguide.com site that contains information about accelerated nursing courses. It is important that you research about accelerated nursing degrees so that you will be fully aware of the pros and cons before you actually invest in such education.
Obviously I’m only telling you this cautionary tale as an excuse to play not one but two versions of the song. One by NWA, the other an acoustic version by Nina Gordon. Both very different, both very potty mouthed.
9.) "Indeed, people speak sometimes about the 'animal' cruelty of man, but that is terribly unjust and offensive to animals, no animal could ever be so cruel as a man, so artfully, artistically cruel." From The Brothers Karamazov by Fyodor Dostoevsky
And fall on my rear.
Gallup Independent
Been sleep deprived for awhile and getting used to it…I think I am on track to finish everything I want to finish…when you work over ten hour days and have to wake up early to do tasks, you would think I am at least on top of my to do list! Looking forward l my mini adventure and will be good to learn new things and live in a different city. Been living here for over 9 years (this year is my 10yr anniversary of living here!!) how time flies!
Currently StreetPass Hot Springs is in a worldwide Light vs Dark tournament sponsored by Nintendo World Report. Paul, Zach and myself won round 1 vs the NWR staff in a best-of-5 and lived to fight in the second round beginning May 4th. That StreetPass Arkansas is throwing yet another KI:U tournament is music to our ears. We recently took part in a recent SP Arkansas event held at Game Ever, an arcade in Little Rock that we found too impressive for words, and were all destroyed by Jack in Free-For-All. We look forward to battling it out with our new friends (and others from around the world) on Wednesday, May 16th from 7-10 pm Central.
ALWAYS have been copybotters wandering around SL, but this is becoming sick now. Copybotters have increased a lot since i signed up SL,
2 basin
Not often. The internet continues to amaze me with new things like this.
Thank you to all who participated this week with MM, despite the major McLinky Tools problem. I don't think I'll ever use link back again. I'm just going to face the fact that some people are just uncool and won't bother to link back. And they will also never be featured on my top ten. :O)
I do love to organise and tidy
Urban trees also remove large amounts of pollution and improve urban air quality. Although some trees produce pollen which can affect a proportion of hay fever sufferers, the overall benefits of trees to air quality and respiratory health are overwhelmingly positive.
The band photo on the MySpace page, complete with magnifying glass and bleeding nose, is well worth the peek alone.
My Life Would Suck Without You – Kelly Clarkson
Here’s the leg:
Aretha Franklin – Save Me
A new venue for us, GW Fins, located at 808 Bienville Street, is ranked by Esquire magazine in the top 20 restaurants in the U.S. Esquire was right! What a delicious meal, excellent service, wonderful ambience.
The guests are not supposed to wear white ties or evening gowns: just smart dresses and dark suits. Only those who received an invitation card can get access – there is no chance to buy a ticket.
While I put a saucepan half filled with water to a simmer,I pulled out my digital weighing scale and measured out the chocolate and butter into a stainless steel bowl.Then I let them melt over the simmering water.I usually go for the fast track option of melting them in the microwave oven but this time I wanted things to go slow, so that I can calm down. It did the magic. There's something so magical in seeing the chocolate and butter melt together and become one.
And if you want to read why I think all writers should be walking away from their desks on a regular basis, then follow this link.
Geordie
Everything that is in sight.
State was separated into
Reading through some of the bewildering changes in the Soviet orders of battle in Zaloga and Ness (1998) leads me to the conclusion that simplification is needed when reducing everything to a 1:30 NQM scale. After all, MiniHitler and SmallStalin only have 15mm forces with which to wage their wars.
No, hell doesn’t even do it justice– it’s an experience that will be far worse than even my deepest imaginations can conjure up.
Of course with fast flowing water, these horses have suffered substantial injuries, but enter a veterinary team who had heard about these rescue guys and the horses have feed and care.
There are many areas of social welfare policy where we haven’t applied this lesson to our advantage:
You don't even want to know the disaster that was my kitchen after making this dessert.
understood that it was
A few seasons ago I had the opportunity to hear Italian string player Paolo Pandolfo under rather privileged circumstances: a private concert for a very small audience at the Telus Studio Theatre. Pandolfo was performing for patrons and supporters of the Vancouver Recital Society. This weekend he is here in a public performance for Early Music Vancouver.
October 8 – Early morning visit to Victoria & Albert Museum, son loved the weapon room, I loved the jewelry, what a huge museum, so much to see! Had tea in the little museum cafe, and then a walk through Hyde Park, I took the child to his favorite place, Hamley’s. From Hamleys, we went on to Harrods for High Tea (£16.50 per person). It was very pleasant, sitting out in the glass room over looking the roof tops while sipping tea and eating scones, pastries and sandwiches. That evening the hotel made reservations for our last dinner in London at a restaurant called Al Bustan, a Lebanese restaurant on Old Brompton Road, around the corner from our hotel. It was the perfect “last meal” – the service was impeccable, the food was delicious (£80 for three of us again, lots of food ordered and wine), and to the hotel to sleep – as the driver was picking us up at 4:30 a.m. the next morning to take us back to Heathrow.
I had the privilege of keeping company with a wonderful man, who taught me his brilliant philosophy of life, for many, many years. He reminded me of Confucius, and would smile at me with a mysterious twinkle in his eye, whenever I would mention it.
We had a Polynesian feast at Bali Hai. Afterwards, we jumped in the hot tub and listened to the Fab Four (who were performing at our hotel) covering the Beatles. A Martin Denny or Dick Dale cover band would have been more appropriate. But nothing beats witnessing my MCP brother, The Preacher, get sentimental over John Lennon songs.
FireBird reimagines Russian classic entrees like a Faberge-like rendition of Chicken Kiev, plated in a modern fashion and brought alive with ultra-tart cranberries and filled with butter, herbs and arugula purée, on a bed of kasha. Ours was part of an extensive tasting menu and was cleverly split in two, the shells brimming with glorious spring vegetables, displaying chef Joseph’s respect for lovers of the earth.
On top of that, we spend ages on honing our craft, and even longer thinking we’re never going to get it all figured out. Hours until we feel like our dialogue rings true, and hours more to finally have someone else ‘see’ the room our main character is standing in without the description seeming forced.
Back out in the sunshine Blue decided to climb on things.
They’ll taste much better
Freedom from Prejudice
It took me a while, and this is really hard, but finally I admitted it:
This might explain the recently discovered filming trip to Spain that the Doctor Who crew will be soon making for an episode in the next series - quite a number of spaghetti western cowboy films have been filmed in Spain before.
I did not intend on sharing this with you through written word but rather video. Due to some technical difficulty, I am unable to edit the video for a few days. But be sure to check back very soon. I'll show you the places that had an egg cream to boast of as well as how to make one of your own. If you like chocolate milk and soda, this is a post you won't want to miss.
Holly's challenge was to make a simple card design so multiple cards could be easily and quickly made to make a gift set of cards. We only had these four entries. I guess with Christmas crafting, shopping, and other holiday things going on, the guys and gals at the forum just couldn't squeeze another thing in. We sure had some gorgeous entries.
“That’s not my car, Mum!” she calls from further down the road, getting into her actual very small, red and shiny car.
3. Sunday Times Style shoot this Wednesday. Can't look too bloated. I wonder if Satturday night's X Factor goodies and vino sesh with sis will be cancelled out if I drink some of that herbal detox tea I bought? May have to drink the box I reckon.
Dip the dried strawberries into the melted chocolate and make sure the strawberry is coated but leave some room at the top. I feel like the appropriate chocolate coating level might be self-explanatory but maybe there are some people out there who are total idiots who don’t know not to cover up the entire thing. I just dipped them in using my fingers and twirled until it was coated. When the chocolate level was kind of low I used a spoon to help cover the strawberries. Set each berry on a sheet of parchment paper until the chocolate is cooled and forms a hard shell. It takes about 10 minutes to cool and harden.
Galaxy rights? Here’s where the physics comes in. The nearest star, the invisible red dwarf Proxima Centauri, is around 4.2 light years away, ie, about 40 trillion kilometres. So the producers/distributors here need not be concerned about the bootleg DVDs. On the other hand, if the Proxima Centauri film team went to screen their movie of my book and pointed it right at earth, the visual image – albeit very attenuated – could reach here in 4.2 years. (It’d be a silent movie though – if sound could make it, which it couldn’t, it’d take 967,000 years to get here, travelling at its earth-typical speed. Okay, maybe they’d email it and the sound would be there once we downloaded the file onto our Proxima Centauri-compatible iPads …)
In the late 1950s, when Abba Eban was Israel’s representative at the United Nations, Israeli Prime Minister David Ben-Gurion ordered an especially murderous raid across the border.
When you purchase an eBook reader, your first concern might be the size. Some people like them to be much smaller, about the size of a paperback book, while others prefer a larger reader which is more like a tablet. The choice is up to you, but keep in mind that you may want to travel with it or put it in your purse or backpack, so sometimes a smaller one is preferable.
Hi Everyone~ I hope you all had a fun and safe Halloween. My family and some friends had a wonderfully frightful evening. It was the first time my daughter wanted to "really" trick or treat and that added to the fun. It was a night filled with fun, laughter,haunts and LOTS OF YUMMY CANDY. Here are some of my favorites from the past couple of days.
Jaela - play
She then phoned her brother, Jan de Wet jnr, who farms near Belfast.
“But the momentum for earlier action in the United States was much too strong for us to counter.”
08 No Rest
· Words to Live By—Girls will discover great Bible verses for memorizing.
And you look like hell, sort of like a pale sponge drifting in and out of sight.
When we moved into our home about 6 years ago, that is one of the first things we did. Our children and grandchildren all understand the importance of recycling. One of my favorite stories is of a grandson who was visiting us a little before his parents arrived and we explained the importance of recycling to him. His mom arrived and was going to throw out a beverage can and he gave her “the speech”. “Grandma is saving the planet for her grandchildren” and “that’s me” he added.
If you have any news updates or opinions on this occurrence, please comment below and give your thoughts. They are always welcomed. Maybe you can explain how something so horrible could have happened.
I noticed that she had nothing personal in her room-- not the pictures, flowers and cards I usually see with a lot of the patients. I talked to the primary nurse and discovered that she had no visitors. I made a mental note to stop the next time I was going to have her as a patient (we are usually told the night before who our patients are going to be) and get her a little pointsetta plant or some other little piece of holiday cheer.
Called “Door-of-Hope”
1:30PM - 3:30PM -- I nursed a sinful PB&J smoothie .... it had
Lucky for me, the first fear that’s actually been realized here in Paris had to do with Milo. (I’m horrible.) When I came back from New York, I noticed a few clumps of fur around the apartment—like, major clumps. It was bizarre. And a little gross. The next day I came home from work, there was more fur. And then more and more and more. My cat has suddenly taken to ripping out giant tufts of his fur, and it’s absolutely disconcerting.
A tear fell down his face
more able to cook.
“I will not accept that as an option,” said Inn, who was brought to the United States during Operation Babylift in 1975. “I’m an American. This is my home.”
What I realised part way through was that understanding the game improved my chances of getting a good photo through being able to predict a next move. This was handy in many ways, as I could be a bit more selective about the amount of time I spent with my eye to the viewfinder when there was a reasonable game of rugby going on in front of me that I wanted to enjoy by itself. I’ve had several internal debates over the years about the experience of photography in situations like this, or on holidays, when the desire to capture an image forever means you might forgo just enjoying that moment for what it is and creating a memory rather than a photo. I’ve never come to any conclusions. But I’ve not come to regret many times when I’ve chosen the experience over the camera either.
Daily newspaper Le Figaro crowed: ‘You couldn’t make it up! With sex, money and politics, this story is a journalist’s dream.’
We all had a lot of fun this Halloween. Much more fun than last. I am so happy to have had this experience with my children.
He made it all the way to the next-to-last thesis (“94. Enough with the incense already, it’s giving everybody a headache”) with church officials only mildly curious about the progress of the bowl-headed scribe. On the morning of his final day of work, he began writing the last entry as a crowd of onlookers grew around him. “The pope is not ni…” he began. The throng began buzzing with anticipation. The pope is not what? Nitrogen-based? Nihilistic? Luther slowly added a “c”. Nicene? Nickel-plated? Then he added an “e”. “Don’t get upset everybody – it could still be ‘Nicene,’” shouted one observer, trying to quell the growing distress of the crowd. Then Luther added the punctuation mark that would change European history forever, a period. “The pope is not nice.” The multitude gasped, but soon dispersed when they heard a beheading was being set up across the street.
What makes a story like this succeed is the presence of the physical disadvantage which the protagonist has to overcome. Having a hurdle such as Hannon’s blindness to negotiate makes it easier to sustain the viewer’s interest and demands an added touch of creativity in the scripting. I’ve often found that when a tale involves merely exploiting the massive manpower and resources available to law enforcement agencies, it’s much more difficult to feel sympathy for the hunters. Maybe that’s just my natural identification with the underdog coming through, but the (almost) lone and struggling figure always seems more attractive. Henry Hathaway’s direction is smooth and professional in a movie where the action is largely confined to interiors – entirely appropriate since the focus is on a man whose mobility is necessarily limited by his condition. The wide screen of scope is ideal for creating a sense of space in outdoor shots, but Hathaway’s experience meant that he was also aware that careful composition resulted in equally effective visuals in interiors. Generally, there’s a tense atmosphere maintained throughout, but there’s also a nicely judged comedic interlude where Hannon sends his servant/secretary off in pursuit of a suspect; Cecil Parker brings a welcome, lightly comic touch to this stalking sequence and the subsequent reporting of his progress. In the lead, Van Johnson is mostly fine in conveying an alternating mix of frustration and enthusiasm, the shape of the investigation both reflecting and influencing his moods. I also found him convincing as a blind man, the only time he let it slip a little was during the climax where a few reactions didn’t quite ring true. Vera Miles wasn’t given a lot to do as the faithful former lover, much of the time playing a clichéd and stereotypical character. Of course, that no real criticism of the actress, just the part she was handed. The supporting cast is full of fine British character actors: the aforementioned Cecil Parker, Maurice Denham, Estelle Winwood, Patricia Laffan and, in a droll turn as an assassin that reminded me a little of Edmund Gwenn in Foreign Correspondent, Liam Redmond.
I am so deeply moved by the outpouring of love from my family and friends over these past days. My husband was first on the scene, the first one I clung to, the one who held me up when I felt like I couldn’t stand on my own two feet. Then came my Mom, my sister, my Dad — dropping what ever it was that they were doing to be by our sides. To help us break the news to our kids, to help us make sense of the broken shards we were in the midst of, just to simply be there when we needed them most.
FB: Why? Is everything ok?
But I did see the baby's gorgeous, unmistakeable profile. The stretching out of long fingers and the adorable heel of a foot. A real, boisterous baby moving every which way inside of me. And oh, would it be impossible for someone to stop themselves from falling head-over-heels.
One might wonder what could possibly be bad about losing 100 lbs. Well, first of all, you don’t gain all that weight just because you like food. There are underlying issues to deal with and they don’t go away with the weight. In fact, not having food to cover them up with makes them all the more apparent. That could (and should) be a blog entry in itself. Later. And you would think the ability to shop anywhere would be fun and maybe one day it will be, but right now, it’s overwhelming. I used to have 2 or 3 stores I could shop in and very limited options. Now I can choose almost anything and I’m not sure where to start. I’m not sure what my “style” is if it’s not loose shirts over pants. The other day, my husband and I were shopping (he needed new pants because he’s lost a lot of weight too) and I passed this pretty dress on the rack. I hesitated and then thought, why not? I took the dress into the dressing room in 2 sizes (the one I thought might fit and the one I thought would be too small), tried on the smaller one and it fit! It not only fit, it looked good! I ran out, bare-footed, to where my husband was waiting and the look on his face said it all. He hasn’t seen me in a dress in forever. I guess that was a good thing and at least, a good start.
After searching their site, I seen beautiful handbags, beautiful necklaces, lovely earrings, and stunning bracelets, I stumbled upon the Garnet Bead Bracelet and fell in love with immediately.
51 Life of Pi – Yann Martel
The Hornbeam Kite was selected because it is the most forgiving kite for novice kitefliers (like us!) We named it the Headless Hornbeam because it has everything but a head . . . wings, a tail, a skeleton and without a head it has no idea where it is going! It is easy to put together (all you have to do is tie some string) and almost anyone can get the kite to fly (we’ll see about that!). The Hornbeam does not require a tail, but definitely looks beautiful with long flowing streamers so we thought we would include them.
Et puis le journaling, il est où le journaling??? Enfin, sans lui il n'y aurait pas de page! Mais pas de panique, je me suis un peu creusé la cervelle et j'ai trouvé! Il fallait que je le cache. Vous voyez cette espèce de rond bicolor tout en haut? Et bien, j'ai attaché un rond du papier sous le morceau sur lequel j'ai imprimé le texte, l'histoire de pouvoir tout sortir de la cachette et voilà!
The cellar - a nail-studded door
Do you schedule a special time for fun creative activities?
Gonzales, who remarried in 2010 and now has a 3-month-old son, said she talks regularly by phone with her three children in Gaza. She said she’s fearful for them amid the “constant chaos” there.
Davis’s platinum-selling song “Let It Rise.”
So despite whatever disdain I may have for your show and its ilk, you should nevertheless make it about your passion, intelligence and abilities. Full stop. That's all any viewer will ever really want from you, even those of us who tune in with such low expectations.
Scripture Reading from Colossians
Dianne Gladstone, 55, New York, N.Y.
but now everything just seems within reach
It was the first 1-2 finish for Audi at Sebring since 2005, and gave the brand its 10th victory since 2000.
Still, I love it. And I have a funny feeling...this is only the beginning!
"Feeling tension and stress brought on by situations which are out of her control, leaves her feeling helpless, anxious, and in adequate. In order to build her self-esteem back up, she looks to others for recognition, respect, and encouragement. This can be a problem since she tends to blame others for her shortcomings. Searching for solutions that are geared toward her needs and self-consciousness."
I went outside yesterday and took this picture, using the zoom. These little butterflies have a wing span of only one inch. Believe, it?
- In Saipan, 1944: Japanese military told the civilians that Americans would rape and torture them. So, when Americans took Saipan in the summer of 1944, the civilians threw their children and themselves to their deaths at Marpi Point cliffs. Those who hesitated were shot by Japanese snipers. The Americans tried unsuccessfully to stop the mass suicide. The U.S. Navy rescued many from the sea who had survived the fall.
(19) William Tyler, Bishop of Hartford
This guy is a street performer that I found in a traffic light, his work was really amazing; when the traffic light was in red, I grabbed the camera and I liked this shot a lot, it was my favorite from the day.
I got my first set of my very own luggage when I was about 8 or 9; I was so excited! Owning my own suitcases, ones that were mine and mine alone, just seemed like such a grown-up kind of thing. Never mind that the only place I was really going “on my own” was summer camp. It was a two-piece, turquoise blue set, one large case and one smaller – and “overnighter” I think you’d probably call it.
Although working for Louis Vuitton on the Champs-Elysées seems like the perfect life to many of us, Amy's transition to living in Paris did not go without its hiccups. The book isn't a tackily sweet tale of perfect Parisian stories, but rather a real observation of life in city. In the end, you'll fall in love with Paris, food and life with a passion like Amy has.
Bonus entry: You can "Like" my new suspense novel, Caller ID on Amazon.
It was inspiring to be there.
11/01 - Detroit, MI - Magic Stick
A simple, proven, and cost effective way for improving the condition of your home is with carpet cleaning. This is a good idea to add value to any domicile, be it a house, apartment, or single room. It is a great way to make a nice home look even better. To clean the carpeting in your home you can either hire a professional or use one of many do it yourself opportunities available in most areas. If you choose to do it yourself the work may…
We will be eating cupcakes and enjoying ourself. It's my "baby's" 3 year birthday today and all she wished for was a Cupcake. So I made lots of them for her party Sunday ♥
The adoptee (for sake of argument I’m talking about newborn adoption) might be hurt by both sets of parents. Even in an open adoption how does a child come to terms with parent not raising them, especially if there are more children after they were born. The child might feel hurt and betrayed by both sets of parents. The adoptee might never understand why they were placed and why they could not be kept with their original families. And then you bring on top of that sealed records, falsified birth certificates. It would be a struggle for anyone to manage this “triad” with all the mixed emotions.
Is it winter? How do you know it’s winter where you live?
with a pay rate of $30-$250 for the lot. Another job was to write a 2,000 – 10,000 word ebook, where they sent you the research. Pay rate for this one was $250 - $750. Writers are supposed to bid for these pathetically paying jobs. And always someone who is totally desperate or just doesn’t value their writing,
#3 Too much CitraSolv will make the image run. :(
The postgrad course on community engagement consists mostly of students undertaking a Masters of Educational Studies. This is only the second time it has been run and last time there were only two students (and one had to withdraw half way through it) so I’m looking forward to running it with a few more students. It covers similar ideas to the undergraduate course, but it is in more depth. With Jasmine and Alexa at school, I’m really passionate about community engagement by schools, so I’m looking forward to some of the discussion in both the undergrad and postgrad courses about the community engagement in a school setting.
A remarkable story, indeed!
patient about my sensitivities. After all,
Number four is specific to each child:
Back from a silly number of book festivals and school events. trying to forget most of it. Like the boy who wrecked the crucial moment of my gory story by putting his gloves on his ears for comic effect. Oh, how I laughed. And the school hall where they couldn't find the lights and so I thought I'd help by walking through it to see if the light switches were at the other side - maybe they were, but I didn't get there as I crashed into the chair and table which had been positioned for my talk.
A: Making a list
My early education was influenced by this socio-political context. The English language was forced upon all the Puerto Rican students as the main vehicle of learning. Many teachers in those days expressed resentment of this fact, and their resentment carried an independentista message directly to their students. The preservation of our national language became an important tool against colonialism in the absence of sufficient strength to oppose the fierce repression through other means.
1 tsp chilli/chilli flakes
I'd say don't expect the next great thing you've never heard (but who knows, really?) but do expect some interesting facets that should keep your attention."
You haven't walked yet
In 1761, the year after the choice of the Immaculate Conception as Patroness of Spain had been approved by Clement XIII, Spain and its possessions also received permission to make use of the office and Mass of the Immaculate Conception, which was then in use among the Franciscans and which clearly taught and praised Mary's singular privilege of the Immaculate Conception.
ZB-It’s good. I like it.
“Based on definitions contained in regulations, waste is divided into categories that include high-level, transuranic, mixed transuranic, low-level, low-level mixed, uranium mill tailings, hazardous, sanitary, and special case waste.” (Vol. 1, pg. 2-4). Mention of greater than class C wastes (reactor vessel components, highly contaminated resins, etc.) is avoided.
1/2 cup soy/nut milk
It is a haiku kind of day, more contemplative, a different way of creating, and well, enough said. I hope your day is filled with grace, resting in knowing you are completely you…and that is good.
We put money and glow bracelets in balloons and blew them up for popping later.
"Well, if they did Steve Jobs didn't invent them... too soon?"
I'm a little anxious today. Actually, I'm a lot anxious, but I'm trying to pretend I'm only a little anxious.
In a beautiful pea-green boat...
Mirror Maru – Swag5
15. Girls' School (bonus)
Seats were there by the sides of the caves
I did get a magazine for research and it's very close to unreadable. Sorry. The screen isn't big enough to both have the entire page on the screen AND be able to read it without a magnifying glass. This is probably iPad territory. You must embiggen it and read sections at a time. Very clumsy. I don't know how it's solved but it doesn't work for me.
8. July 2009
melted long ago
3) to develop creative and commercial opportunities for individuals and organisations involved in the short story genre.
Remove cake from oven and allow to cool for 10 minutes in the pan
I guess that technically, that could be considered a flower in a way. So many things to photograph, so little time. There are times when I wonder if I should narrow my focus to just birds, or just mammals, or just flowers, but that’s not me. I photograph what catches my eye, be it animal, vegetable, or mineral. When I post those photos either here or on a social media site, I find that people have never seen these things before, like balsam fir cone above. And here’s a little secret, I had to look up to see that the photo above was a balsam fir, something I knew once upon a time.
with a pork, cranberries and morello cherry stuffing
and empower my fiendish need for a queenness
Row 2- ch1, turn, sc in 1, 2 sc in next.
Of unsurpass’d heroes, (was one side so brave? the other was equally
I should be studying for my biology exam tomorrow
"See you in a few years!" I would say,
Either the head janitor:
Kate: “Your Vaseline/sugar trick is exactly this! (and probably much cheaper!) I always love going into the LUSH store and trying out all the samples. I tried this one and had to buy it. After applying some scrub to my lips and swishing my lips together, they were incredibly soft! I like to use the scrub every morning… and since the product is made with sugar and peppermint, it’s totally safe to lick off the excess!”
Night after night residents of the town guarded the house, and they are willing to swear that no one entered or left the premises during the night. And yet the figure robed in black or white appeared.
The Onion is having some more fun with other people's trade marks. This time it's Dippin' Dots - a brand with which the IPKat is unfamiliar: the thesis is that, in the future, the earth's inhabitants will consume Dippin' Dots rather than traditional ice cream. " ... dessert items are made by flash-freezing beads of cream with liquid nitrogen, then storing them in subzero conditions. People enjoy these treats with great regularity, and often remark upon how delicious they taste ...
Rudyard Kipling – The Mark of the Beast
Hate is your number one date
There is more than beer to Olympen. It may be one of the grandest cafés in the whole of Oslo (yes, maybe even grander than the unbeery Grand Café located on Oslo's version of Champs Elysée, Karl Johans gate) with its huge chandeliers and high ceiling. I thought I even spotted some craft beer interest from the young bar man, but maybe I was just hallucinating. Anyway, upstairs is a rather less beery, but no less stylish and cosmopolitan night club, Pigalle.
At the Poetry Reading
- Bath tissue 24 double (=48 single) roll $10.00 each (Purex)
But oft, from the Indian hunter's camp,
I discovered I have a few fears: Obesophobia (gaining weight) and Gerascophobia (aging).
‘Gunga Jumna’ is hell of an inescapable film. The Big Burglar at his best. It has made me miss many of my script deadlines for ‘Saudagar’. For me, the dilemma has always been to decide what is more rewarding—watching a Dilip Kumar film or writing a Dilip Kumar film?
That said, I don't think I will be making them again. Neither my peanut butter loving husband nor I really liked them that much. I kept wishing they didn't have that weird light peanut butter flavour. I wanted the peanut flavour to be stronger or not at all, and also that the instant hit of sweetness from the powdered sugar to be dialled back a tad. Hence why there are still two and a half left. Actually, can someone tell me if using powdered (icing) sugar versus granulated sugar would make a cake taste different?
And remember you dont need a PMS digital image to play, but if you
d) In order to stand firm in this labor, resolve beforehand not to withdraw from what you recognize to be necessary, even if it may, mean death. To achieve this, when you first resolve to do so, offer your life to God in order to live not for your own sake, but for God alone.
Uttapam is a dish I am only familiar with from our trips to Kennedy's, but my British genes were reminded of pikelets (a kind of flat crumpet) by Dosa's version. Fred and I liked the idea of the sampler plate - a selection of several mini uttapam, each with a different topping, but were less enamoured by its execution: The caramelized onion one had the most flavour, the fresh tomato was bland, likely because of the unavailability of good fruit during the winter season and the mutter, or peas, was the most disappointing (the peas were almost as hard as bullets).
You wrapped me up in a hug and I knew that I needed to go. I could feel it and I knew that you could as well. It was just getting too hard to keep staying. “I’ll wait for you.” It was a statement so simple that it managed to easily hide one of a soldier’s biggest fears.
Regardless, Hunter intends to pursue additional co-sponsors for his bill, spokesman Joe Kasper told The Hill. He will “definitely” make his case for consideration of the measure to leaders “in the coming weeks.”
Likewise, the much repeated statement that the Pakatan opposition parties have hijacked Bersih for their own selfish political purposes is not supported by the facts. Admittedly, thousands of Pakatan marchers walked the streets on Saturday. They were noisy, boisterous and loud in the support of their leaders. That only represents a partial truth. An equal, or perhaps larger numbers of persons walked, not because they support Pakatan, but because they are totally disgusted by the Election Commission. If Pakatan benefits electorally by securing the votes of this large group of persons, Barisan Nasional and its proxy, the Election Commission, only have themselves to blame. They are the authors of their own misfortune. The latest revelation that the chairman and deputy chairman of Election Commission are members of Umno merely confirms why they have never been neutral in the discharge of their duties.
And all they that heard it wondered at those things which were told them by the shepherds.
I’ve found a small office of the same lab that never seems to be all that busy which makes me feel the specimens and the results will be well looked after. This may not be true at all, but I like the psychological comfort it gives me.
* Text w/ Adjustable Font
Kingdom manual put out by the church earlier this year which prompted me to ask hard questions, do you think that’s anti-Mormon? I’ve gone out of my way to avoid anti-Mormon websites and books. Do you think I’m an idiot, easily deceived and influenced by anything anyone says without looking up the sources? “
But what the fluff is this fuck a duck porn business at the end? Eh? EH!? I didn't realise you had such a potty mouth. Or do you suffer from Tourette's?
In Jonathan Morrow’s book for new college students entitled Welcome to College: A Christ-Follower’s Guide for the Journey (Grand Rapids: Kregel, 2008), he offers helpful thoughts for students as they transition from high school to the demands of college. (You can read my review of the book here.) Among his topics is a insightful chapter on spiritual formation entitled “Becoming More Like Jesus” (pp. 221–230).
This evening, as I looked at my growing pile of scraps, I decided to see what I could make with them so I wouldn’t have to file them. I ended up with two cards and a slightly smaller scrap pile. Here’s the first one:
I don't like parking garages.
Al's drawer thing came from Ikea also. He's had it for years.
The life of Benny A. Lyde was cut short September 2, 2006 by the hands of gun violence, but his contributions will last forever. Please read the articles at the links below to learn more about this incredible young man.
It will happen.
The evening (UK time) brought the Inaugural Parade and the thought that Obama is either a very good actor or very weird, either of which are troubling. For has any man ever looked so delighted at watching 637 Marching Bands? And this horror was inflicted on the world soon after the announcement that America would abandon the practice of torture.
“We are very excited to become part of the Home Care Pulse Program. Visiting Angels of Lorain always strives to provide the most professional, highest quality care to our clients as well as a great place to work for our employees. In the past, we’ve surveyed our clients and caregivers, but now with Home Care Pulse we can see how our clients, their families and our caregivers value those high standards compared to other homecare agencies across the nation” said, Robin Donnelly, LPN, Director of Visiting Angels of Lorain.
Long before I lent you my dvd of the film I told you this was my favourite film of 2007, so I am glad to see we are back on the same page. Needless to say, I concur with almost everything you say here. I was very attached emotionally to the film's romanticism, even while I was critically attacking it intellectually. Holbrook delivers a stellar performance, while Emile Hirsch is a revelation in the central role. More importantly, Sean Penn's work as a director cannot be lauded enough. His film is a touching and honest tribute to one questing vagabond, to this beautiful if ill-prepared and starry-eyed pilgrim soul, part Thoreau, part Kerouac, and Penn does a commendable job of capturing, honouring and questioning McCandless's journey. And yet, it is not a fauning tribute, as Penn takes a more moderate approach to the protagonist, presenting McCandless as neither a heroic nor a tragic figure, but as a charismatic, single-minded, flawed and wounded individual trying to find his place in the world. Penn clearly sees a lot of himself in the character, just as Krakauer (the author of the book upon which the film is based) did before him. And I must confess that I fall into the same camp. Watching the film was an intensely intimate and personal experience as a result.
So I got both.
I watch liquorice strings and refreshers, milk bottles and penny chews,
At this stage, Tanya and Nigel decided to amalgamate the Conservatorium's intermediate string ensemble and the BHP Steel Wind Ensemble into a new, younger orchestra. This decision immediately doubled the size of the ensemble, meant a steady stream of school-aged students would be continually available to join the orchestra at a lower level of musical expertise, and enabled the group to play a wider selection of repertoire.
He detects a very small amount of stimulant in the kids’ bodies.
Our Special Ale 2011 (Anchor Christmas Ale) has been released annually since 1983. Every year is unique in some way. It's one beer I always look forward to every year. I've been drinking it since 2002. Sadly I don't love it every year. This year is one of those "meh" years.
In the midst of the rock-banging and counting song-singing, my husband came home. We changed the boys into their pajamas and settled in for prayers and lullabyes. It’s rare that I’m able to get a shot of all five of my brightest blessings together. From left to right: Mr. Man, Beanie, Daddy, Baby Guy, and Bugaboo.
to 7 years old, yet they have all
I also love drawing on mustaches.
The first projects are a simple blind and tote bag (when you're just sewing straight seams)...
1 virtues
Friends of the Raytown Parks in conjunction with Raytown Parks and Recreation will be offering a free 5 week Tai Chi class on Thursday evenings at Colman Park, located at 59th and Lane Streets. The classes will begin this week on Thursday and run for five weeks. Participants are asked to
sampladelic sorcery Bush trailblazed is part of the fabric of
Here's what I think people don't understand: Good hardly ever factors into popular or entertaining. People aren't going to youtube, for example, to watch someone do something meaningful or profound. They're going to watch some guy stick a lit firecracker up his bum. I would rather see Sharktopus than The English Patient. That's just how I roll.
It clarifies the product’s structure. Better still, it can make the product talk. At best, it is self-explanatory.
This portrait sent to me of Maud Eva Pike (born 1888) and her class was sent to me by her grandson Stephen Cook, who believes it was probably taken around 1895 in the vicinity of Lipson Vale, Plymouth, Devon, where they lived at the time. Plymouth, for once, is included in the list of places visited by Mr Holden. In the census of early April 1891 his "family" were living in Hull, although he was recorded as a visitor in South Bishop Wearmouth, Durham.
Finally, the Sultan also cautioned the state to preserve Malay reserve land and prevent it from being transferred to non-Malay individuals or companies.
Frankly, I trust Maoists more than Islamists. (I think when you look at the big picture the story actually proves the contrary of the author's gleeful expose of conservative paranoia.
I really think that running changed my life. As dramatic as that sounds, God used it in my life at a place where I needed it. I needed the discipline and the sacrifice. I needed to prove to myself that I could start something and see it to the end. It made crossing that finish line so much sweeter. I started training in January when Will was 6 months old and I was 20 pounds over weight. It. was. hard. I was so badly out of shape from pregnancy, giving birth and still having a lot of baby weight on my body. At the beginning when I was huffing and puffing through one mile, I would feel sorry for the people on the Biggest Loser who have to start from scratch with an extra 100 pounds on their body. My knees hurt, my lower back hurt, my lungs burned and I was only running a couple miles. Part of me thought to myself, "how will I EVER run 13 miles". I prayed a lot during my runs and the Lord kept reminding me to just trust the process. To just worry with the run I had to do that day and not look on my training schedule to weeks ahead. Focus on today. Slowly, I started to gain endurance. Each run became easier and easier. I have said it before and will say it again, week one and two running 2-4 miles for the first time was WAY harder than week 14 when I was running those 9 miler long runs. So if you think you can't run a 1/2 marathon...you CAN! I was there once too. I use to tell Taylor how I wished I could be that disciplined to run and complete a half marathon. I never thought I could do it either. But I did it and I started out in the worst shape of my life and the heaviest I have ever been. Anyone can do it.
I'm sad though. I napped with Wilson all the time but I was so eager to move him into his crib at night.
and there, a company around the table, a chorus
and what comes around, every Spring, (here in the UK, anyway)?
The men oversaw several essential projects, like installing shoe mold and fixing some stubborn doors.
Here are some of my latest creations:
F you for not being able to recognize strength and confused it for weakness; for confusing honesty with dishonesty; for distorting trustworthiness with manipulation. All of what you told me where lies because you were still evaluating me based on someone else’s actions. I can admit that now, it’s your turn.
Above pictures show how my kids room looks now. Do you see the difference? We have so much more space in our kids room and I love it. I wish we could have done this much earlier. It was convenient to have the futon sofa in the kids room when people came to stay at our place, but many other times, it was just attracting kids to climb on or draw on it. My younger daughter still sleeps in her crib and my older one sleeps on a Japanese style futon (I’ll show what Japanese futon looks like some other time) and since we’re moving out of our apartment in a month or so, we are not expecting any house guest. It is fine without the futon sofa and removing it from the room created more space for our kids to play. One less item for us to worry about when packing out, more we’ve gained from it!
After much public tongue-lashing from the opposition, Najib finally admitted to Parliament that it had paid RM84 million to FBC Media between 2007 and 2010 for ‘consultancy services, advice and management of a communication campaign’ to spruce up Malaysia’s image. Apart from painting a falsely flattering image image of himself, the documentaries also painted a rosy picture of Malaysia’s oil palm industry and its treatment of indigenous peoples – which are in stark contract to the views from the ground.
master the Three Mysteries of their own Body, Speech and Mind;
I forbear comment about anything other than reporting the weather would be excellent for being outdoors this weekend.
Eugene Clark, 47, New York, N.Y.
1/2 cup flax seed meal
“So then faith cometh by hearing and hearing by the word of God.”
But this week saw an unrepentant Fifa and Budweiser taking this abuse to even higher levels. Orange is the Dutch national colour. It's quite reasonable to expect fans of the national team to wear it. Unlike the trousers last year, this time there was no branding, no mention of the beer at all, anywhere on the garments in question. And yet these girls were ejected from the game and held against their will for several hours afterwards.
Rather, you must grow in the grace and knowledge of our Lord and Savior Jesus Christ. All glory to him, both now and forever! Amen.
2012 is, of course Jubilee year and the Royalty of brewing (well years of hanging out in the Royal Hotel in Penarth must count for something) in South Wales, Bullmastiff Brewery are celebrating after brewing for 175 Doggy years or 25 human years!
Remember the pedestrian bridge and the East River walk I told you about? One warm weekend afternoon, Mom decided we should walk along the river as far as we could, and just see where it takes us. We walked almost twenty blocks and we were about to turn around and head for home. Thank goodness we decided to walk just a bit farther, and that’s when we found it.
Having the ability to determine the significance of sex on a case by case basis is not something that only men have the power to do. I wish I had understood at a much younger age that casual sex is amazing! I can have casual sex, not because I don’t value myself but because I have more control over my emotional self. Sometimes sex is just sex and that is okay.
Joshua Bell joined the orchestra for Brahms’s Violin Concerto. The first movement could be accounted an unalloyed success, its orchestral introduction – ‘introduction’ hardly seems appropriate here – beautifully handled by Jurowski: well-phrased, mellifluous, clear of purpose. Bell’s tone proved silvery and golden by turn, the latter coming to predominate, always perfectly centred upon the notes. However, he could show vehemence where required, though even then it would be exquisitely shaded. And how the second subject sang – both from soloist and orchestra! Form was clear, as it should be, but without turning into a mere formula; there was always, for which Jurowski must surely be credited, a keen sense of the organic to Brahms’s progress. Bell should be applauded for trying out his own cadenza but, alas, it proved no match for Joachim’s. As for the rest of the movement, though, I could find no fault whatsoever; nor should I have wished to do so. It was unfortunate, to say the least, that an alarm of some sort coincided with the opening bar of the slow movement. But the real problem, or rather one of the two real problems, was the tempo: it simply sounded too fast for an Adagio, and more importantly, too fast for this Adagio. The opening, moreover, emerged a little too moulded in Jurowski’s hands. Bell seemed at times simply to be trying too hard. One could not fault his playing as violin playing, but his seeming insistence to wring out the last drop of intensity from every phrase became a little too much: Brahms veered dangerously close to Korngold, and Bell’s approach seemed strangely at odds with Jurowski’s. The finale was ideally paced: there was clearly much for the audience to enjoy and, I dare say, to swoon over, but a little less would have been more for me. Bell’s approach seemed better suited to lovers of violin virtuosity than Brahms, but if you consider Brahms an out-and-out Romantic, closer to Paganini than to Schoenberg, you would probably have thought differently. Even I, however, wearied a little of the intensity of his vibrato. It all seemed a great pity, since the first movement had promised so much, but sections of the audience whistled and hollered nevertheless.
"In 1975, Claudio Rocchi (Stormy Six) was already a well-established counterculture icon and the italian folk-psych-cosmic-out-of-his-head minstrel par excellence. Most of his listeners were hence slightly shocked when he suddenly almost completely replaced the guitars, the strings and the percussions of l miele dei pianeti le isole le api (“the honey of the planets the islands the bees”, 1974) with a cut-up of field recordings, samples, modulated soundwaves and analogic synthesizers assembled in a home studio, building with Rocchi an actual wall of sound between him and his usual audience.
“You have to think of the ball as a clock face and your thumb at 12 o'clock. You want to release the ball with the thumb between 10 and 11 and the fingers between 4 and 5.” Richard could obviously see the completely blank expression on my face and explained further. “As you're right handed, the ball is released anticlockwise and that gives a hook which means the ball comes in at an angle which will knock more pins down.”
Minutes after leaving the airport I spotted the first Vervet Monkey and before I reached my destination I'd seen several types of buck and a lonely Giraffe. Adventures had begun!
I left in a boy’s car. The blue sweater
Apparently I have a very nice voice. I was flattered to hear that, really. I think it’s not that pleasant.
I have learnt and performed a couple of pieces from “Songs of Travel” in the past, but have shied away from "Let Beauty Awake". I believe that I was probably intimidated by its beauty. That a man such as I cannot sing something so beautiful. Yes I can sing out the “Vagabond” and even the sad lonely journey of “Whither must I wander”, but not this piece of elegant beauty. “Let beauty
Total Weight Gain: I gained 4lbs in 4 weeks! This has been tough to swallow..but I know its for the best!! I really don't have any control in the matter now do I ... :)
Once the dough has doubled in size, punch it down and turn it out onto a lightly floured surface. Knead for a few seconds then form into an 8-inch square. Starting with the edge furthest away from you, roll the dough into a cylinder. Turn the cylinder seam side up and pinch all along the seam. Place the dough into a lightly greased bread pan seam side down. Cover with plastic wrap and place in a warm, draft free, place, for 20-30 minutes.
The main reason is actually not the pigtails, though that is an important factor. It's mainly because I don't even WANT to be on the guild site. I completely appreciate the thought that they still want to include me after I quit and since I run the vent, but aside from this blog (and I know that this is going to make no sense) I'm generally pretty private when it comes to my pictures going up and online. I don't even have pictures for my Facebook or Google+ accounts. It's hard enough for my own family to take pictures of my when we have those stupid family gatherings, I'm elusive as fuck. There is only one picture on the web of me and I plan to hold it there for a very long time.
This agar-agar was often trotted out at celebrations. As schoolkids, we’d have a class party on the last day of the year. Everyone would bring a plate and this was the dish Mum would often make. It’s simple yet very eye-catching, and appeals to anyone with a sweet tooth.
For the base I used OPI Jade is the New Black and China Glaze 2030 stamped with konad plate M66.
Catherine Pellegrino
There was a time in the 1980s when some really fun games could be made out of fairly mundane activities. For example, a frog crossing the street (Frogger), serving drinks (Tapper), and cleaning a sink (Bubbles). Perhaps one of the most memorable of these involved delivering papers.
Silly soldiers...don't they know the gift of themselves as strong survivors is truly enough? Their smiles and hugs are just icing on the cake.
The path continues through lacy cow parsley in a narrow tree belt flanked on either side by football and rugby pitches where what must be some of the last games of the season are under way. We cross Beverley Brook, a tributary entering the Thames at Barn Elms, and much improved in recent years, by means of a footbridge which provides the venue for a quick game of Pooh Sticks. A short walk across the sports ground brings us to the busy A3 at Robin Hood Roundabout, where the pedestrian crossing has a companion in the shape of an equestrian crossing complete with red and green horses!
or staying up for Doctor Who.
Yellow cake with chocolate buttercream (do the same with chocolate cake)
This loose and garden-y looking bouquet is made from cuttings in my yard.
I started it about four years ago, but, never really wrote anything much, hopefully this attempt will be more fruitful. The old name for the blog was ‘Read ‘em and weep’, and the blog url had my name in it, both of which I wanted to change, which I knew would change going over to WP, however, I wanted the RIGHT name.
My recent move to Wisconsin has had an unexpected side effect: I have caught three vicious viruses since we got here, including the one I am now fighting, a scant three weeks after I recovered from the last one!
And the thing is that it wasn't a big deal and it didn't affect anything and I'm the only one who fucking cared. I didn't realize just how much I was blowing it out of proportion until I spoke with Hunter on the phone. I'm pretty sure he thought I must have done something really horrible that was going to cost the company money or something by the way I was talking about it. By the time he understood what a small issue it was, I felt a bit ridiculous for having been almost in tears. But that's how I work. I care very much about what I do and I take pride in it. I'm a strict task master with myself and just push and push and push myself towards better and better results. God help me if I make a simple mistake because I just go off the rails a bit. Sometimes I take a breath, think things through, and think "jesus christ, kid, calm - the fuck - down... or don't, enjoy that heart attack you're working up to."
I'll be showing you the rest of the new range over the next week or so, so keep your eyes on the blog.
These 6 boys are adorable, their friendship is enviable. The bromance reeled me in right from the get-go. They hang out together, go to (and skip) school together, get in fights together, rock out in a band together …they’re family. Each of them have either busy, working parents, embarrassing parents or non-existent parents who don’t even acknowledge them. OR (in the case of our quiet, brooding drummer) a MOB boss parent. *snort* I can’t imagine trying to deal with that one in high-school.
The same goes for the frequently patronising coverage of arts institutions outside London in general. The media has been full of tut-tutting about financial and other issues facing newer regional venues like Gateshead’s Baltic and The Public in West Bromwich, but considerably less on the successes of places like the New Art Gallery in Walsall or Nottingham Contemporary.
I have always been the type to become very quiet when facing a
So that darkness covers the land
Some ideas are short, and some ideas are long, and we need to make sure that the good stuff gets to the reader intact, neither cropped nor stretched to fit the publishing industry. This prize is terrific because it brings short stories out of hiding and into the spotlight, brings them to big audiences, at a time when the publishing industry either can’t or won’t.
Thanks so much for stopping by, you are always welcome here!
Directions: Take one hour for Self Discovery. Light a candle and put something next to it that you love. Sit quietly with a warm shawl about your shoulders. Soften your body - starting with your feet and going up to your crown, paying attention to each part of you, including your organs, with a special focus of becoming present to your heart. Say a prayer that you will be able to listen into the spaciousness of your own soul. Be quiet and still and let yourself enter dream space.
"IT'S FIVE AM! Can't we wait until we have had some coffee?".
going on?
He drives, she mostly sleeps; when she’s awake, they quarrel, and now, in a violet dusk,
Paul John Gill, 34, New York, N.Y.
Oh, you’ve got to be kidding! This house was built in 1974! Is he serious? Like I have the permits for a pool and a deck?
I am one who helps you experience joy and delight.
So forget your commemorative china, that is so last Royal Wedding! Here are some of my favourite Wedding Memorabilia Thingys/ Shameless Money Making Thingys.
+ it's one of the best feelings when you get back what you think you've lost. turns out, it's been somewhere inside you, waiting for the right moment to reappear.
Traquair House Brewery Lld Traquair House Ale
In this article, The Social Life of Routers, I apply social network analysis thinking to designing a network of routers for computer networks.
I normally don’t like cupcakes. I love brownies, then comes cake and then comes home made cookies. However, at Wekfest 2 years ago my friend, Leanne made these amazing tasting red velvet cupcakes with team logos made out of fondant on top. OMG! So delicious. I asked her for the recipe and it remains saved in my facebook messages so I thought I would share the wealth and pass it along to you guys. Seriously, the best red velvet cupcakes ever.
lace doilies, buttons, dressmaking tissue, muslin
I estimate that each cycle will take 2-4 weeks from implementation to data evaluation.
Bush, then, was undoubtedly a good conservative in his thinking but his judgment of what he needed to do to gain and retain power meant that his actual policies were mostly only slightly to the Right of centre.
Other key benefits of the simpler Rotary design are weight reduction, with fewer parts the 950g damper with its integrated rocker is lighter than a conventional damper and separate rocker set up. John McQuilliam confirms “We did achieve a weight saving over the conventional layout when you consider the damper, its drive arm and reaction bracket.” McQuilliam goes to on to highlight its packaging and resultant aero benefits “also the packaging is easier, without finding a volume for the damper. Akio Haga who is now alternating chief designer at Force India was laying out the rear suspension back then and we had a few different lay outs, mainly to try and keep the mechanicals out of which ever area the Aero was telling us was most important”.
*Movement?:Yep, now I feel it all the time...this baby is a very busy little one...
Kulananda and Dominic Houlder are Buddhist teachers who have also been highly successful in the business arena. They have observed that one of the greatest causes of suffering the wealthy West is our love/hate relationship with our money: No matter how much we have, we don’t feel it is enough, or we fear losing it, or we mourn the way we are forced to earn it. In Mindfulness and Money, the authors use their Buddhist understanding, and the examples of others on the Buddhist path, to reveal the key to financial peace, whatever one’s income.
In Runweld, there's this armored man who took the liking to blocking people! To get him out of the way and earn a standard key, we must go through a bunch of talking sequences. After talking to the guard, head over to the right to talk to a cooking wench.
However, growing up in the country as I did, you learn quickly that opossums are not cute. They are pretty nasty creatures.
But times are changing. Years ago the WI was the only thing to do but now women work and have active and varied social lives so WI doesn’t have the same appeal.The infamous ‘naked calendar’ and run-ins with the Labour party, efforts to modernise it's image and increase membership, demonstrate the efforts of the increasingly publicity-conscious WI.
You have no one to blame for not being able to achieve what you desire for but often yourself. One needs to see and understand the need to earn their respect, dreams and wishes. And the effort put towards earning such things in life often paves the path and enables you to meet your dreams. There is no substitute for hard work and perseverance towards ones goals in life. People who adapt such relentless hard work, focus and continuous self development towards their goals in life often achieve them and enjoy the glory and success. While those who choose to just desire and never do anything towards meeting their possible success often end up taking solace in their failure or excuses for not being able to become successful. Success and wealth has often been a result of hard, persistent and sincere work with courage, perseverance and unwavering focus towards achieving it.
My answer was to get a ghost writer – me – and pay me £156,000 + 98% of the royalties plus all the chocolate I can eat.
October 8 - Mikey Welsh, rock bassist (Weezer), 40
“Why didn’t you tell me sooner?”
-Demands phone call.
Fox Orlando
(BTW - Chile celebrated 200 years of Independence this past Saturday, September 18)
Robert Ashton on p. 17 of "The English Civil War: Conservatism and Revolution 1603-1649". (2nd. Ed.; London: Weidenfeld & Nicolson, 1989
Have you moved every 18 months for the last ten years? If yes, how do you go about making the new place feel like home? Tips for meeting your neighbors when you have never ever seen a single person alive in your development? (Zombies live here.) The guy across the street has the General Lee up on blocks in his driveway, but aside from knocking on his door and professing our shared love of the Dukes of Hazard, I haven't met too many people here.
I link my misgivings about the Leadership Summit to an ever-increasing number of people talking about the need for “resurrection” in The United Methodist Church. This troubles me, especially when I hear it coming from our bishops and agency leaders. First, it is a clear admission that they believe we are dead. You cannot resurrect that which is living, so our church must be dead. This is a painful assault on the hundreds of thousands of men and women who have given their life to Christ and their service to The United Methodist Church. It demeans and denigrates those who faithfully fight to do good work locally and around the world. We may be injured, but we’re not dead, and resurrection talk is nothing more than surrender and abdication on the part of leaders. They may choose to give up on the church, but there are many of us who aren’t ready to lie down yet. There are many of us who believe we are in exile rather than death’s domain.
2 unborn
As with the Matabeleland massacres, news of which the BBC, together with much of the world media suppressed for twenty years to protect their one time hero, Zimbabwe's Robert Mugabe, another secret genocide is being ignored by the world media, the genocide of white Boer farmers, thousands of whom have been horribly tortured to death in their homes since the end of Apartheid. Anyone who clicks on this link should we warned that it includes some very gruesome images as the savagery of these attacks belie the authorities attempts to dismiss them as nothing more than a "crime wave".
* 1/2 tsp worcestershire sauce
Though SGML creates a platform built around the power of extensibility, implementing this power in web browsers has yet been entirely fulfilled.
The Preface for the 2012 Slavery and the Constitution volume concludes with this paragraph:
I had to empty my vacation savings account.
Magic In Theory And Practice, pp. 191-192.
Soft. If fantasy includes a celebrity, I already answered to that question a million times. If I choose someone who's not famous, I will answer a scottish drummer you already met here and that I'll see in few days !!
So yeah, it's been fun putting writing this all down. I've only been here a month so there's probably a lot I don't know about the area yet, but it's definitely grown on me over the short amount of time I've been here. I think the beer has helped a lot with that. If any of you ever make it out to The First State you'll have to look me up, we'll go get a beer or ten.
It is important that we hold to the truth that God never stops loving us even when He’s grieved by our actions.
Stevie gives the new carpet two paws up! He looks very content relaxing here...maybe he was day dreaming of his online girlfriend Miss Boots? ;-) Donna, I looked at the picture on your blog and your Boots looks so much like Stevie!
James Marshall (Dalek) & Greg Lamarche
it was part of the passage our pastor read out this morning and then spoke on, but i was distracted by this verse
Foyles - If you have a few hours to kill, I love hanging out at this bookshop on Charing Cross Road. There are soooo many books and there is a lovely spacious cafeteria too.
9. Face Lift 4:41
Considering how common Civilian Apathy Syndrome is, I seriously doubt we'll ever see a fair and realistic portrayal of our lives.
Open it
Snow in April by Rosamunde Pilcher
Similarly, when IRS regulations said that interest on bonds issued for the Forest City Ratner arena (now the Ratner/Prokhorov “Barclays” arena) would be subject to income tax, New York officials swooped into action to lobby for a special loophole exempting interest on Forest City Ratner’s bonds from the taxes that regulations would have required anyone else to pay. When in 2007 the state legislature planned to enact across-the-board reform of the city's 421a property tax incentive program applicable to the building of new apartment buildings, a special treatment loophole was created to excuse the Atlantic Yards mega-project from supplying affordable housing on the same terms required for any other project.
Last Friday was Sing-a-long night, a disaster because my laptop kept freezing. (Fuckin’ spyware!) Still, because of Sanford’s current environment and my bad choice in music that night, inspiration hit Matt.
If you have family who loves you ......who wants you......call them. Go and see them. Hug them. Make up and apologize to one another. Find the best in one another. Overlook their shortcomings. Pray for them. Forgive them. Bless them. Write to them. Prefer them over yourself.......remember to love.
An Israeli defence ministry statement issued on Tuesday said that the Palestinian Return Centre in Ealing, north London, organises conferences in Europe at which it plays taped speeches by Hamas leaders who are banned from entering the EU.
"I have four different kinds of mustard"
And the clock is still ticking.
Make Ahead
states to develop and
716 D-III/6(B)/1976. “The Trial of Jesus.” Interview by Themi Vasils. Everyman Television Program, Chicago, Illinois.
Around 5:30 a.m. Aho and others were asked to go across the street from the terminal because a suspicious package had been found.
Celebrate the good all around you and be thankful you have the strength to improve your situation in life! Bless someone else…serve others, make your world bigger than your four walls.
Tinnitus is a an unusual noise that originates in the ear or in the head. It may arise at the outer area of the ear, or the middle ear. This is not just a symptom but a major annoyance.. Fluid, infection, or disease of the middle ear bones or ear drum can also cause tinnitus. Hypnotherapy can be very effective in treating tinnitus. This technique was verified through research to help patients with Tinnitus. Check out the Research below.
While many times on this blog I have featured the various larger sizes of bamboo I grow here in Central Arkansas, I have several other species of bamboo which in no way are as majestic as my "giants", but still offer me the grace, color & enjoyment all bamboo provides me.
The clouds are now properly exposed but are a bit brighter than I would like them. Without any blown highlights, the raw file of this photo is workable with the usage of the Fill Light and Recovery sliders in conjunction. However, I find those methods seem to reduce image quality.
In all fairness to McCoy, he isn’t a total clownish d-bag here, and turns in a passable performance. The infamous “cliffhanger” scene aside, he does little to drag the story down, nor does he do much to elevate it. Langford is as terrible as ever. But between the two the improbable sort of happens in the final moments of “Dragonfire,” which features a weirdly offbeat yet sweetly melancholic parting scene between the duo. It was something of a last minute addition, and Ian Briggs swears it doesn’t work, and maybe it doesn’t entirely; yet the fact that something that doesn’t work still manages to be an acting highpoint of the year says a great deal about the faults of Season 24.
A new boutique hotel at a seaside resort in northwest England is to offer guests a sex toy mini-bar when it opens later this year, its owner said yesterday.
I closed my eyes and mentally groaned. “I know that place. Smack in the center of Carlisle. In my opinion, its the worst kept cemetery in the area. For a historical landmark, its in horrible shape.”
Rewards: 1 Anniversary Token, Cloak of the Fifth Spring and Anniversary Fireworks.
Lightly flour a work surface, and place the prepared baking sheet nearby. Before turning the dough out of the bowl, gently press any stray flour into the rest of the dough with a flexible bowl scraper if you have one or a spatula if you don't. Turn the dough onto the floured work surface, dip the bowl scraper in flour and use it to coax the dough into a neater circle about an inch high. Using a 2" round cutter, dip the cutter in flour and cut out the scones, keeping your cuts as close together as possible to minimize waste. Gather the scraps and cut as many scones as you can. Place the scones 2" apart on the prepared baking sheet and place in freezer while you preheat the oven (at this point, the scones can be frozen on the baking sheet, then wrapped airtight. You don’t need to defrost the scones before baking - just add about 2 minutes to the baking time).
Disappointed, I left for work. In the time it had taken me to get ready, the snowfall had actually increased quite a bit. Cambridge and then Robinson were nearly covered, with previous sets of car tracks appearing in progressively lighter shades of gray. Still, several tests of my brakes gave no indications of ice under the thin snow. I looked ahead and could see that Thompson, the big road that takes me all the way to Rogers, was completely clear. At that point, I did the only thing I could do: I turned around in the Walmart parking lot, drove back home, and called to inform my supervisor that I would not be coming in.
What else has been going on?
Wexler takes them to the dean, who bitches them both out in front of him and Reese. Paul tries to tell the dean about the ax,but Wexler explains that he uses it as a prop in his urban legend class. When Paul asks Wexler directly about the massacre in Stanley Hall, the dean asks Reese and the professor to leave, so that he can speak to them in private.
He’s showing his true colours again. I told everybody that he was playing all the Boer and Afrikaner groups when meeting with them. He would never allow a homeland to them, or any other tribe (like the “evil Apartheid regime” did). For one, those wanting their own homeland are currently supporting the criminal communist bunch by paying the majority of taxes in the country. They are his meal ticket. And his whole fat arsed family’s too. Everybody knows that.
Do our BN leaders not feel ashamed that they are so desperate in staying on in power even if it is at the high cost of crushing bones and bodies of fellow citizens?
I don’t think I’m cut out to be a Sports Mom.
When the Jewish people sinned, HaShem exiled us from His palace and scattered us to the four corners of the world. Exile from home, per se, is a horrible punishment, but the ultimate punishment was what the exile did to us. The brutality, torment, persecution, cruelty, subjection and murder merged together to make us forget that were like Yosef - princes in exile.
532220 Formal wear & costume rental
HP: What do you love most about being an author?
2 tablespoons nonfat dry milk powder
TG: I have been filling my flicker account with photos, editing photos, and revising a poetry manuscript I started last summer.
facing some great big-city teams, so wish us luck!
And here they are when I got home! I bought these fab little clip on shoe bows from Pretty Neat Feet to add to my shoes to accesorize different outfits… Yes, yes, I know they’re mix-match but don’t worry I bought both in a set of two, I just couldn’t resist showing you both styles!
As soon as I touched my marker tip to the paper, I realized that I'd made a big mistake and printed my digi image onto Bazzill Simply Smooth cardstock rather that my favorite Copic paper, Bazzill Smooth. Yeah, one word can make all the difference! Bazzill Simply Smooth is so smooth that it almost has a silky feel to it. Copic ink will puddle on the surface as the paper can't absorb the color. The Colorless Blender is ineffective so no highlights or other fun Colorless Blender techniques will work. This paper behaves much like Cryogen paper and other glossy papers for me.
Off and on I’ve tried to get back to that commitment to exercising, but haven’t been able to. Two days ago, I was inspired to try exercising again. Did about 15 minutes of Zumba with my Wii (thanks Mom!) and then pulled out this DVD. Made it less than 10 minutes, then I was DONE. And yet, I could barely walk yesterday. Yikes.
Light skinned black girl
Equally shocking was the quickness of my response. “Oh my, yes.”
Text by Gretchen Laurel
We hope you have enjoyed our week-long
You can put some into your bath water to soften skin, use it in the shower (but I find it to be too slippery to do that) Or y'all can be like moi and put it on damp skin after you shower or bathe. I love this stuff and don't go a day without it! Use lotion afterwards for extra moisture, but I live in a humid climate, so I have enough moisture! I prefer the unscented formula because I wear perfumes etc and I don't want them competing.
Prayer: Father God, I pray for the lost lives of the millions of babies that die from abortions in this country and throughout the world. It is the height of wickedness! Forgive us your people, who have sat idly by while this ongoing massacre continues; Father in Yahshua/Jesus’ Name I pray that the hearts of all believer’s will be pricked and they will repent of the apathy they’ve had towards the murderous sacrifices to the false god Molech called abortion. I pray for godly repentance to come upon mothers, fathers, doctors and all who support abortion and I pray that they will fall down before your throne confessing and asking forgiveness. Lord Jesus, fill us with your Spirit so that we can stand against the powers of darkness that have overtaken the minds of people, making them comfortable with the sin and wickedness that envelope this world. I ask these and all things in the Precious, Holy Name of Yahshua HaMashiach/Jesus Christ….Amen!.
Domain: Domain of the user you are connecting with
The frame is a stamped image onto card, cut out with scissors. I frayed the inside edges before sprinkling on a layer of clear embossing powder. To finish, I daubed on some white acrylic paint to soften the colour.
I made off-to-college quilts for both my sons. I focused on choosing patterns that have a graphic design with a secondary design - sort of puzzle quilts. One was a split 9-patch in the colors of DS's guitar and the other was a wonky quarter log cabin.
Professor Pongoo’s personal mantra was that the other parties “talk the talk, but as a penguin, I can show them how to walk the walk”.
Oct 4 - Star Bar - Atlanta, GA
Hmm. I just referred to myself as a Wiccan for the first time in ages. Most excellent.
The wind blow cold?
At the start of her descent she could hear the clinks and mutterings of her following foes. The sound became muffled then silenced as her heedless gait drove her onwards. A few times during her descent she passed open archways with similar corridors beyond, but they were generally choked with sand or had such awful stenches emanating from them that Sharia passed by without consideration. In places the corridor itself threatened to end in a cave-in of sand, but she always managed to push through and onward.
* October 6th 10:00 am to 1:00 pm - First class
FAMILY & FRIENDS DAY will include TWO dynamic WORSHIP SERVICES at 8:00 AM and 11:00 AM on Sunday, February 5.
We tend to just go with the flow and let things just be.
Just in time for NaNoWriMo. Although -- I don't think I'll commit myself to 50,000 words this November. But I do hope to attend the local library's session on writing a novel in 30 days. Any hints on speeding up the writing process will be appreciated! I'm still applying the Six Core Competencies and Snowflake methods to developing my latest novel. I've been scribbling ideas in a grid-lined composition book and I have a binder full of research. I've even settled on pictures of the main characters (some well-known actors in their younger years)!
Fresh oregano
She's almost turning over.
Why relevant? This squad is the beginning; last summer was a watershed moment, the squad assembled now feels like an important corner is being turned. One where a strong foundation exists, with experience at the club mixing well with the youth. Not wasting the opportunity to finish third is as important as a strong summer for the manager, pruning and reinforcing. Secateurs allowing more subtle adjustments.
depending on who you talk to, 3 months is the longest time ever,
Now it's my turn with my first sketch for this amazing team. I hope you will
1377 *D-IV/5/2001. “A Sad Case: The United States Supreme Court and the 2000 Presidential Election.” The School of Law, The University of South Dakota, Vermillion, South Dakota. (Incorporated in Item C-2002(4), above, pp. 203-08.)
I came back from Belgium a week ago, but it was a hectic week at work... My nails are very, very short and in a bad condition (most of them broke). And I don't even want to mention my cuticles :(
**RS, right shoulder**
French vanilla and double chocolate chip ice cream with baileys stacked on an oreo base, topped with chocolate fudge and whipped cream.
Gizmodo says: “Both AT&T and T-Mobile have HSPA+ networks, so American users would be able to enjoy this speed bump (well, in the case of AT&T, who the hell knows what the speed would be). The same is true in Europe.”
The health care provider may prescribe vitamin and mineral supplements to correct nutritional deficiencies. Occasionally, corticosteroids (such as prednisone) may also be prescribed for short-term use or if you have sprue that does not respond to treatment. Following a well-balanced, gluten-free diet is generally the only treatment you need to stay well.
Tuesday: Teaser & 1st Paragraph PLUS Mini-Challenge
Just as important is the fact that often, the surviving spouse has a loss of income due after their partner’s death. Parents often take time off work to be with their young children, which could negatively affect their careers. There is a financial cost, even if the deceased did not have any income.
* Credits Page
Each month, we use random.org to select a prize winner and this month our prize is growing according to the number of entrants we get in the challenge! Your prize starts with a fun 6x6 pad from s.e.i. This pad was designed to coordinate with one of their Christmas lines this year, but it's a totally versatile pad with bold colours and simple patterns- you'll be amazed what it coordinates with! We'll be adding in 3 yards of coordinating ribbon, as well as some fabulous bling... who knows, there may be more added to the bundle if the entries keep coming in :)
P90X has definitely helped my endurance and strength...and this was good evidence of that for me. Cool beans. And..yes...it still sucked. Just not quite as bad. When I was done, I rested a bit then did the rest of KenpoX (punching, kicking, blocking). That was a serious crazy double workout for the day...1698 calories according to heart rate monitor. Yowsa!
Although the Joy of The Lord is my strength, im honest enough to share that (at times) the things of life taps into my joy and sometimes I feel weak and my faith gets frazzled…
DEFINES RIGHTEOUSNESS….
And guess what! Those people who "don't like candy corn" sure didn't turn their noses up at this bark.
What a crazy life!
* University of Rochester, New York (USA)
The regal Whitney Queen Bow and the Whitney Princess are truly befitting of royalty. Both are available in pinch clip and French clip styles. The 5” classic Queen Bow comes in no less than a dozen colors, all the better to go with her majesty’s many wardrobe choices! The Whitney Princess, a 3 ½ ” grosgrain version of the Whitney Queen Bow, is available in eight colors.
The others arrived and we followed with a round of (what else at Harry’s?) bloody marys. The bloody mary’s are good – I prefer mine a bit spicier (again easily rectified by just asking). My fellow drinkers really liked them, but bemoaned the lack of “stuff” in them (celery, etc) and a neighbor complained that it had too much of the “brown stuff” (Worcestershire, I imagine?)
I see tonight…
Know the passage of the turning of earth
Wonder what’s in that thing, I told him, holding my breath, not even daring to hope against hope.
Alien Lanes: 12
they are fresh from our kitchen we do experience delays when we have large changes in our family, the company and during holiday times.
And now every day we get closer and closer to the newest, 3rd, last flick in the trilogy starring Christian Bale and directed by Christopher Nolan.
There are bittorrents posted in multiple formats (FLV, AVI, WMV). There is also a link directly to BBC, a 1G MPG, of the raw footage that day, but there’s no way they have the bandwidth for all that.
When dear Lillian Gish died in 1993, months short of her hundredth birthday, I remember thinking that surely hers would be the longest career in film we would ever see. Starting in 1912 for Griffith, taking in so many masterpieces of both his career and then of Victor Sjöstrom in the 1920s, continuing in supporting roles in such films as Duel in the Sun, Portrait of Jennie and The Night of the Hunter and coming to an end with The Whales of August in 1987. She was 94 when that film was shot, the last in a career that lasted 75 years. Just think of it – three quarters of a century working in films and she wasn’t even a child star.
And now on to a few closeups...
We turned to Bill for the right words to help us through this difficult situation.
1. My novel has a prologue, but the "voice" in the prologue is much different from the "voice" in the rest of the book (long story...). If the submission requirements for Agency X want the first ten pages of the manuscript with your query, is it better to include the prologue in those ten pages, for clarity (my prologue is less than ten pages), or just begin with chapter one? In my case, at least, the prologue is referenced many times in chapter one, and I don't want to confuse agents.
He/she is so meticulous.
i go from the delusion that everything is going to be a-ok,
The Cancan Dancer and the Duke (Cancan) was inspired by real life. See, I was a dancer in high school. One of my teachers choreographed a ballet based on the life of Toulouse Lautrec. He is famous for his posters of the French dance hall girls, in particular the ladies of the Moulin Rouge. His posters, and those of other artists like him, were used originally as advertisements for the dance halls. They were posted around Paris to entice spectators to the establishments. In the ballet, I got to dance a very tame version of the cancan… OMG! I had no idea how cardio deficient I was until I started rehearsing that piece. LOL!
Anyways, this album, “Patience (After Sebald) is a soundtrack to a film about the dead writer W.G. Sebald, directed by Grant Gee. This doesn’t really feel like a film soundtrack, since it sounds a lot like The Caretaker’s last outing, “Empty Bliss” since it’s loaded with crackles, distortion, lonely piano lines and the feeling of your mind slowly deteriorating. Not to say this thing is a bad thing- your mind isn’t really deteriorating. The album just puts you into a mindset that transports you to another realm.
23 Ram's Head Live, Baltimore, MD
Tips on a 9v Adapter
Course 3- Entree 1: Bison sliders w/Cotswold cheese and homemade OPA mustard paired with Oatmeal
Key as well is that you need to be convinced of your superiority over your opponent. In the matches where we have pressed teams to death over the last couple of years, nearly every example I can think of took place at home, where we usually expect to win, regardless of opposition.
The Horniman Museum, best-known for its walrus and aquarium, also has a rather wonderful Victorian conservatory. It was built in 1894 for the Museum's founder Frederick John Horniman, and originally located in his Croydon garden. He built it for two reasons: to house his own collection of rare plants, and to provide his elderly mother with a comfortable garden environment. After his death it gradually fell into disrepair, but moved to the museum grounds and underwent conservation in the 1980s.
I didn't have time to figure it out just then - the day was calling, and I'd already spent too much time on it.
For quite a few years, I worked in the jewelry industry. I’ve worked with fine jewelry (the “real” stuff) and high fashion jewelry (the “not real” stuff.) I don’t discriminate when it comes to jewelry and am happy to wear EVERYTHING. I don’t care if it costs $2 or $200. I don’t care if it’s silver or gold or maybe even…BOTH (heaven forbid!) If it’s jewelry, it’s an accessory and that makes it my friend.
Trust me, I would not suggest peeling a lime. The lime juice got all under my nails and stung something terrible. And, my fingers were all sticky. At which point, I must have rubbed my hands on my thighs and touched my forehead.
For many cultures this may be perfectly understandable. For most westerners, this may seem a little foolish. What I can tell you, as a South American but also as someone educated and strongly influenced by Western culture, is that you have to understand the context. Latin Americans are mostly Catholic and are strong believers in miracles and in many places, in the supernatural. In countries around or near the Caribbean, there is a big influence of African mystic beliefs, the root of Voodoo and Cuban Babalaos… In many rural areas people believe that magic can happen at any time. They pray to people who have died in highway accidents who they believe can grant miracles. In Venezuela, one important cult is in the western city of Merida, where a shrine has been built for a thief who was thought to be a local Robin Hood- stealing from the rich to give to the poor…
The heart of the prank was four videos featuring Conan: introductory takeover rant, two faux product reviews and the resignation.
It seeks not revenge, nor redemption – well versed in how to burn or sublime ;
Mrs Silverman was not won over by this explanation. She pressed charges against the gardener for cruelty, and when Mr Attwater heard of this he flew to Florida to negotiate with her in person.
Add wet ingredients and apple sauce to the dry mixture, and combine with a wooden spoon. It doesn’t have to be completely smooth, just so that all the ingredients have been incorporated together. Let batter sit for about 10 minutes while you grease and pre-heat your pan*. Be sure to lightly grease your pan, even if you’re using a non-stick.
So what are we getting with this film? Ninety minutes of playtime for grown men who are pretending to be things we (and they) know they aren't.
US Senator Roy Wyden, after his visit to the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power plant on 6 April, 2012, issued a press release on 16 April, pointing out the catastrophic risk of Fukushima Daiichi Unit 4, calling for urgent US government intervention. Senator Wyden also sent a letter to Ichiro Fujisaki, Japan’s Ambassador to the United States, requesting Japan to accept international assistance to tackle the crisis.
When the Norsemen arrives they were appalled to discover the locals using timber for fuel. Timber was held sacred by the Norse and used only for ships.
As for the tricks up my sleeve...
14. Hobbies?
Many of my photos are taken outside on my back deck. The light is decent ... not great ... but decent. Depending on the time of day. This, however, does present some other challenges of it's own. Like wind. And carting my dishes and other props outside. And, even outside, light is a huge challenge! Just check out the shade vs. bright sunlight areas of my deck.
“Peanut Vendor” with Xaviar Cugat
She wanted to die. God had other plans.
However, the only messages you'll be spreading will be that of rejoice (for sparkling like metrosexual ken) or the spirit of Christmas (as a Christmas decoration).
The fading nation of Entropia is having a lousy time of it lately. No one visits anymore, and is it any wonder. The airports are closed--officially blamed on a 14-year strike by the Toiletpaper Restockers Union. The only way in is through a poorly maintained tunnel with an exorbitant entry fee. But the Tourist Board's Ernie Shodabruski has a plan.
I want to focus on another big reason we all drink beer. Contrary to the great George Thorogood, most of us do not like to drink alone. Most of us drink with our friends, or the person sitting next to us at the bar, the bartender, or the like-minded sports fan across the bar. Anyone that's within earshot really. We do so because it's part of our DNA.
A week passed by just like that. My parents went abroad and I stayed at home looking after the three kids. It was very exhausting but very satisfying. To be able to spend time with them, cooked for them and then fed them -- I had tonnes of fun and joy. But as I am now already in my 26th week, I find myself get tired very easily. Normally by 10pm dah terbaring atas katil, hehe.
Perhaps some background is in order. As a freelancer, much of my stress comes from sources outside of my control. Will an editor accept my pitch? Will my invoice be paid on time? Will I hear back from a source for an interview? Is someone actually reading and reviewing the job applications I send out daily? Stresses do not pile on my doorstep, they swirl around me in a nebulous void of constant uncertainty. I do not say this to complain; I love my work and wouldn’t willingly trade it for anything. But that isn’t to say it’s all sunshine and rainbows, as there are certain unavoidable realities that come along with the work.
So I’m borrowing a page from my friend Cassandra, who has successfully adopted a schedule model to keep her posting regularly on her blog, and once a week I’m going to post about things I’ve learned about Public Relations. This is no college class, this is no formal education, this is just my experience and what I’ve learned from it, and hopefully it can prove useful to someone else.
3. Be a follower here at Fab Rehab (via Linky Tools or GFC)
The only time I've ever smoked in my life was a couple of joints on two occasions in the same house. This Swedish? Danish? Norwegian? actor went to Cuba and he and I struck up a good, short, but solid friendship. He threw two parties in a row and every single person there was someone I trusted. Still, the weed did nothing to me, so I haven't touched it since.
RF 2009/2011
1 cup gluten free flour (I use Bob’s Red Mill)
I chose the name “Rose” in honor of Nora’s oldest sister, who shares the same middle name, also in reference to the Novena to St. Therese. At the end of the Novena a rose is received as a sign of answered prayers. Try it! Prayers were answered above and beyond with my first “Rose” and I DON’T DOUBT THEY WILL BE AGAIN. It seemed only appropriate.
We'll never forget the scene. God Bless Barack Obama and God Bless the United States.
You must be a blog follower to win. Stop over and see my friend Abbie at the Vintage Moth and enjoy her generosity. Have a great week.
I asked the Jellypark Design Team if they fancied creating something for the challenge (girls you are the bestest!!) and here are their creations!
WHO: Governor John Hickenlooper; Grand County Commissioners James Newberry, Nancy Stuart Gary Bumgarner; Penfield Tate, Denver Water Commissioner; Summit County Commissioners Dan Gibbs, Karn Stiegelmeier; William J. Baum, Clinton Ditch & Reservoir Co.; Eric Kuhn, Colorado River District, General Manager.
The concept is interesting, intriguing: walk on in and you feel like you've entered into a super-fancy, super-pricy place. That's the point: but the prices of the menu items are very affordable. The restaurant is a classroom for budding culinary stars to practice their skills with less pressure than working at a fine-dining establishment off the bat.
What beats wrapping up warm and stepping into the snow with only your nose peeking out?
“That chicken really wants to go through that door,” said Star as they held the frenzied squawking creature. And at that moment the door slid silently closed, almost unnoticed by everyone except Arik, and Dr. Chickenhiemer.
I point out the half completed Michelle Paver and Roman Mysteries by his pillow. He deals with the inconsistency with his usual, eerily adolescent shrug.
The Fitted Mattress Pad is filled with 10oz/yd² Natura Smart Wash WoolTM creating a moisture-free, temperature controlled barrier that repels common allergens and is machine washable! The cotton sateen cover has a fully elasticized cotton percale skirt that fits mattresses up to 12 inch in height.
A crowd following behind, Saleh moves quickly, hoping to out-race the possibility of a confrontation with State Security.
- tuna, salmon sushi roll, edamame, boba coffee
3 cloves garlic, coarsely chopped
But Mothers Day is this Sunday!!!
On Sunday we stayed at home and had congee at home. We bought some local take out food from the cafe downstairs including Cheung fun (rice noodle rolls) and some plain fried noodles. Black Sesame ice cream is one of my favourite things ever and I gladly devoured a pot with my family for dessert! This commercial building is opposite our apartment, no matter what time I look out, there is always some poor individual working over time in front of the glare of a computer screen. Last week was my first week of the next few months working in HK. Catching the bus in the morning and every single day hearing the 'doot doot' of the Octopus card (an even better version of London's Oyster card). Why is the Octopus card better? Well because you can use it on a crazy amount of transport but you can also buy things using it....like cake (oh yes!), plus mine is in this cute pass holder I bought in the UK from Paperchase. Next we have some Chocolate Milk from the fridge at work...the fridge is like a vending machine, it's FULL of different drinks for staff to drink from Coke to classic Vitasoy.
So, never ones to be beaten by a lack of hickory (or whatever the missing ingredient happens to be), the chefs decided to trial smoking whole pomfret (a type of fish) using the bark of gum trees.
The music isn't very engaging. Or good.
Remember to click on the person's name or card to see all of the details and leave these wonderful DT girls some comment love! :)
These nighttime extravaganzas feature stimulating light displays on the fronts of buildings, with accompanying sounds, as a way of drawing attention to structures' histories. (Here's a neat example of Notre Dame getting the son et lumière treatment.) If Yannatos' "Son et Lumière" is a symphonic manifestation of a sound and light show, then the edifice it's meant to memorialize is nothing less than the globe itself, with its three movements entitled "Europe," "Asia Minor-Asia," and "Africa." As Yannatos himself wrote (according to these program notes), "The title alludes to past as well as to present events in which the political face of Europe and Africa is changing."
“My favorite part of doing Lip Sync has been getting the chance to dance with girls from my sorority and helping make our team look great for Greek Week,” -Annie Wald
Lisa: Why not!? We always have a wonderful time in Vegas ….
